The Hobbit pub has set up a Facebook page to help save it. However, given that SZC has more money than those who run the pub it will be a battle that can only be won if SZC shows some humanity and charity, and finds a legally watertight way to allow this "infringement" to continue as a "one off" (so that others are not tempted to infringe its rights).
As I picked each one up to put back in the box,
Nor does will any English kid ever meet kangaroos tumbling into the tunnel.
A five hour schlep from Springfield, IL the directions are simple (as ever): turn left, keep driving, arrive at your destination. Sure enough after traveling on flat, straight, Illinois roads we arrived at the state line and Beef-a-Roo. Don’t worry, we opted for the Subway instead. Upon arrival we dined on homemade pizza and caught up on life, having not seen each other for several months.
About 11 I went below to my stateroom. After a short conversation with my father and mother, and saying good night to them, I stepped into my room to put on pajamas expecting to have another delightful night’s rest like the four preceding.
I was doing my best to soak up every detail. Not just about our specific ladies retreat meeting in and of itself. But in the actual facility. I found great delight in sneaking a photo every now and again. And I should have taken way more. I wanted to, but time nor opportunity would allow. Of all the simple touches there, there were so many that "warmed" my heart.
1 stick of butter, softened
And they are…
This new ornament that my sister-in-law Susie gave me…
I hope you all have survived all the candy from the easter bunny and did enjoy some lazy days during the vacation :)
So he went back down. They smoked and they talked to nice strangers and they danced, even though he never dances. Nor does she, really, but she took him out there in front of real people and she made him dance to Gay Bar and Florence and The Grating Voice and laughed when he cried "I can't believe what happened to Tony!" like he always does when that Journey song comes on. She smiled patiently when he tried to sing Creep at 4 a.m. with some bloke he'd just met who had a guitar in the residents' bar.
Very light on the nose with a smooth, long taste.
The team opens the month with Chicago followed by Miami, Atlanta, the Lakers, San Antonio and the Clippers. The month also ends with a matchup against Kevin Durant and the Oklahoma City Thunder. The Sixers will have to take advantage of the teams that they are clearly more talented than. To finish north of .500 during February, the team cannot afford to give any games away.
The top referring sites in 2010 were facebook.com, twitter.com, en.wordpress.com, thomandsean.com, and bigextracash.com.
It’s been a productive time since my return from my 12 month holiday. I am currently working on my 5th painting and I have taken the time to put the finishing touches to a few paintings that were in my storage rack.
In retrospective we should have gone with the “standard” alternative but that said, every dish but one were absolutely excellent. I don’t think I have ever been this satisfied with every new dish showing up in a Restaurant before. Victor´s is definitely one of the best Restaurants I have visited.
And so the culture of impunity rolls on, as a new crop of political actors take advantage of their positions to enrich themselves at the expense of the state and the people they ostensibly came to serve. Those hailed for having ended a regime notorious for its corruption are beginning to mirror its most excessive practices. Already there are reports of junta members buying lavish houses in Bamako for themselves. This is, alas, what passes for “normal” around here.
If your saw or trimmer engine dies when you let off the throttle trigger you may have ....
I've spent part of my late afternoon and early evening emailing with one such touchy moderator who didn't like my tone when I called 4e what it is: a dead system. It's as dead a system as OD&D, or Basic, or 2E, or whathaveyou. I define a dead system as one not currently supported by its property owners. With 5e, the death-knell has been sounded on 4e - it's worse than that, it's dead Jim.
Bi bi mooon
together, and they’ll support a roof and keep grain dry
While people are interactivatin' like crazy with each other, interactivity with ads is miniscule. Bastards. Don't they realize we built all this shit just to sell them something?
Then there is the book Imagine a Place by Sarah L. Thomson and Rob Gonsalves with beautiful pictures and short descriptions. Roadways transform to waterways. Curtains turn into dancers. A few of the pictures lend themselves to discussions of figures of speech.
Gold: Nectar Des Dieux, Bastone Brewery, Royal Oak, MI
I don’t know about you, but frankly the idea of drones patrolling American cities frightens me. If they are actually utilized here in the states it won’t be long before they are used for violence.
“I’m from London,” he replied.
“What’s for dinner?” asks Isaiah.
State: Still got that Dogzilla taste in my mouth (that's what she said, oh).
Obviously something was going on the last few months. I wasn't myself. I could barely get out of bed in the morning. Throughout the day, all I wanted to do was crawl back into bed. My body felt dead. I had two beautiful smiling children that made me happy - but as soon as I put them down for a nap and was left alone with myself, all I wanted to do was lay on the ground. And I did - literally. I would be cleaning up the playroom and I would stop what I was doing and lay down on the floor. Just to close my eyes. Or to cry. It felt like my hormones were rebelling. Like my body decided to start fending for itself.
While all of the arguments fly around this amendment, and while pastors speak for or against it from their pulpits–in ways that harm and abuse one’s power in one case in particular–I am reminded that the reason I believe in the separation of church and state is because I have Baptist roots. Deep Baptist roots, apparently. Because real Baptists believe in it. In fact, Baptists are the reason we have freedom of religion in the First Amendment. Baptists also are believers of autonomy and freedom of the local church and individual beliefs. And even though I’m part of a non-denominational church, I’m still really down with all of that.
Why can’t you see through this mask?
Although I feel it’s my duty to write a celebration of mothers on Mother’s Day, every time I think about what I might write for this post, all that comes up in my mind is a kind of lament.
This plant has two blossoms~
What has been achieved?
When I was seventeen, and in year twelve (Senior in high school), I begged off going to church because ‘I had too much homework’, and I resigned from the reading roster (Yes, I was still reading, it would have upset Mum too much to have stopped, so I did it for her). At seventeen, however, I’d got to a point where I was absolutely convinced there was no god and this was all ridiculous. I knew I couldn’t go on reading anymore, when, EVERY TIME I got up onto the lectern I just wanted to shout “Don’t you all know you’re being CONNED, this is RUBBISH, go HOME”.
It would be so refreshing to see a celeb saying it AS IT REALLY IS. Who admits to relying on a nanny, who struggles with losing the extra weight, who just looks fecking KNACKERED.
why do i love a blurry picture so much....
Geeta lives with her mother and works as a street performer with Raka (Dharmendra) and Jhumroo (Master Ravi). She’s loud, vivacious, a bit of a crook and nothing at all like her twin sister. There is much made of the differences between the two: Geeta’s fiery nature and her loving relationship with her mother for example, compared to Seeta’s meek obedience and her constant craving for her lost parents. It all sets the scene for the inevitable switch between the two sisters.
And I was right… about the original movie. The second and third movies were an absolute waste of time and I couldn’t sit through 15 minutes of either, but i figure the six dollars would have been a bargain still if I had just been getting the original.
606 D-XII/18/1970. “How to Read a Book: On Noticing the Obvious.” University High, The Laboratory Schools, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois.
Here is how I will have the students make their own copies. We use this format for our 6 Step Vocabulary in Texas History. I learned this from a friend in another school, and she learned it from someone else, and so on, and so on, ... Students begin with a sheet of notebook paper:
COVERT AFFAIRS - Blonde, attractive, and athletic Annie is a fairly new CIA agent. She's got style and she can work her way out of some tight situations. It's my answer to ALIAS. I always wanted to be Sydney. Now I want to be Annie!
I spent the day having actual conversations with my husband without constant interruptions, scrapbooking and re-watching the Gilmore Girls seasons. Awesome. However, I thought their theme song summed up the way I feel about my kids and how my mom feels about her girls.
A Pillow of Winds
but where you are, offering the flower of your breath
£26.5m IRA bank raid man may go free McGuinness challenges RAAD to disband Derry woman’s A&E nightmare Inquest opens into IRA men shot dead by SAS in 1990 LOUGHGALL INQUEST TO BEGIN Home Rule and the Ulster Covenant Teenager’s joy over Google doodle Pisa’s Leaning Tower joins greening
So I looked at Emily’s blog, Drew’s, and Sarah’s and was pleasantly surprised at how each one connected fairly well with mine.
“I have to admit,” he said, “that I’m one of those people that still thinks the dishwasher is a miracle. What a device! And I have to admit that because I think that way, I like to load it. I like to look in and see how that dishes were magically cleaned.”
it’s all about the art of translation
She had always been the affectionate type. Be it bear hugs or full-on-tongue-to-tonsil-inspections, she could deliver when it came to showing her enthusiasm. There is a hidden, very real danger in this kind if conduct.
Cornet James Douglas
My mind was always set right,
On June 20, 1955, the day my father was born, there was a total eclipse of the sun, the single longest eclipse in more than 1200 years. The world was dark for a total of seven minutes and eight seconds that day. But just shy of 46 years later, when my father died, the world went dark once again.
heart attack while driving
During the last years of the Balhae kingdom, it was wrecked by endless internal turmoils, ethnic strifes and civil wars between the various races in the empire and it was eventually conquered by the Khitan kingdom of Liao in 926 AD.
So enjoy the next three years as a demigod, as all Ministers of Government do in this hell hole of a country that you and your kind have made it into. Your true calling as Opposition Chief Whip will be here sooner than you think.
Chris Clement is a minister with Summerland Grove Pagan Church, based in Memphis, TN.
This movie is unquestionably my favorite war movie off all time, and what I would consider one of the best made films of all time. Reading about the struggle it was to get this movie made; the budget, the weather, the heart attack, the weight, it all makes for a hardship that I think actually added to the movie, instead of detracted from it. This movie perfectly captures the growing feeling of uneasiness our protagonists feel as they go deeper and deeper into the jungle.
From an early age, reading has been one of my great loves, a passion I'm pleased to share with all four of my children. It's because of them, and only them, I'm about to embark on the second of the Harry Potter series, not my usual focus. It's been several months since I breezed through the first, may even need a refresher or possibly have Wallace bring me up to speed, he seems to have them all memorised, as do many other nine year old boys I'm sure. I've recently enjoyed To Kill a Mockingbird again, having read it now three times, first in Year 11 English, at the time a refreshing change from the heavy-going Macbeth.
What’s this? A recipe! Gasp! Finally, after many long weeks of drought in the recipe department, I have something new to share.
love Obamacare?
two birds
Buy a newspaper today; buy a Wall Street Journal. See if you get a Millard Fillmore dollar in change.
The other great part of this book is that you can receive follow up emails that include healthy recipes and fitness tips every day. It is always difficult to stay focussed and on-track but with daily reminders and support you will fell that you can do it.
Finally, it’s time to title your project! Titles can be tricky, but you can always change it later. Pick out a specific phrase or image from your project to start with. Decide if it would make an eye-catching title – or even just make a nice working title – and stick it on your title page.
Run for Change has recently become the Run for Change Society, an official non-profit society. It is now in a position to more effectively seek support and resources to continue and expand the work demanded by its mission and vision.
So this is Jesus’ answer specifically about fasting – They don’t need it right now. They will need it later; but not now. Keep that in mind for a moment.
14The second woe is past; and, behold, the third woe cometh quickly.
-Pinch sea salt
And then just when I think there is no hope for this bobby pin queen, the heat blowing monster rises! It tumbles my hair in the diffuser bowl down the tunnel of mousse where I vanish into the light scent of lilies, lift my hair with my large toothed comb, and cross my fingers for a taxi encounter.
1/4 cup of HP sauce (or any other BBQ sauce)
Sat 10/11 Milwaukee, WI The Eagles Club
The last part of my Daily Four are Word Work and Listening. I have 17 children in my class and only four computers. That is a little bit of a dilemma if I need half of the kids "listening to reading." So, I break up my class into half. Nine kids do Word Work (alone or with a partner- it's their choice). The other half are divided up among three Listening choices- computer, iPod, and Read to Someone. On the computer they have limited choice- BookFlix, TumbleBooks, Storyline Online, or Starfall. This is probably their favorite Listening choice. I purchased the Scholastic books on CD and downloaded them to my iPod. The children have a tub of books to choose from when they go to the iPod choice. Read to Someone is pretty explanatory if you're already familiar with Daily Five. The kids keep the same listening choice for one week, then swap to a new one. The Listening/Word Work time is when I meet with students for reading conferences, small groups, and DIBELS progress monitoring (and lately for assessments-- hopefully those will be wrapping up soon, since report cards are almost finished).
Up and down front. Trails were a bit stickier than this morning after some day-time warming. Ran the entire downhill again.
It's an unusual night. There are no boogie monsters. Only some noisy rats and dreaming quail. But everything keeps its distance. I am utterly bathed in moonbeams.
Two other portions of the exhibit also pack a powerhouse of grief and regret - videos and memorabilia of the murders of Bobby Kennedy and Martin Luther King. Listening to snippets of their speeches is another painful reminder of what America lost in that fateful year.
Just as they had drilled on Earth, the two men detached their land craft from the underside of the lander. Its massive wheels dug deep into the Moon’s static landscape, leaving a lasting trail. The two men bounced along in relative silence. Only the sound of the buggy’s wheels digging into the dirt accompanied them over the dividing point. The temperature dropped rapidly as they crossed over into the dark. Kostya prayed that the new thermal linings developed for the mission would be enough to keep them warm. Vanya turned on a rack of floodlights to illuminate their path.
She's so cute . . . and was such fun to color! I've been just itching to make a card with her and these gorgeous DPs (by Stampin' Up). Cardstock is Blushing Bride, also by Stampin' Up. Those scrumptious roses are from Wild Orchid Crafts!! OK . . . are ya ready for something fun? Wait for it . . .
Now I know where to go when I get out of work early on Monday's.
But what does this tell us about the state of mainstream politics?
Now stay with me, because I am not one to go around thinking of my awesomeness. Hardly. And I am old enough now to realize that these kinds of things often have far more going on in them than physical appearances, thankfully. This was certainly one of those cases. For I am certain she was responding to me radiating a certain energy in her own interpretive way, which really means she was attracted to my wife. (“That’s hot!”)
“Comedian Grave Digger” – A Song
Face in hands
4.) Wait for the sprouts to appear.
Her loyalty to our friendship. Loss of trust, faith, role as her friend
Macedonia’s Interior Minister announced that police had arrested 20 radical Islamists on Tuesday in an operation in several villages around the capital in connection with the murders of five men in Skopje on April 12.
First, all the failures have occurred because the Ribs were not well glued to the Hemisphere, this is due to the fact that they were made using PVC. Unfortunately it is not possible to glue properly PVC using Epoxy, and this led to the failures.
However, there is a scene at the end of the first chapter where the boy Severian receives a coin from the rebel Vodalus. Severian makes an interesting observation that will bear heavily upon the importance of the events that follow:
If the government would cut social benefits, the English, would react violently.
money and the People are exempt from levy – so you attorneys never pay
My stupid social anxiety gets in the way, though. No one’s going to notice me if I stick to doing my job and don’t come out of my hole. But at the same time, I start panicking at the idea of getting out of my hole.
today, i have the most amazing privilege of sharing with you the news that i have been asked to join the design team over at My Mind's Eye. i am beyond honored and thrilled for this incredible opportunity and blessing. i absolutely love their products from the rich colors to the amazing brads, the lines make me swoon and i create with their products until the very last "scrap" has a home. i thank everyone at MME for this opportunity. i look forward to creating with such an amazing and inspiring team and look forward to sharing with you my love of their gorgeous products.
I am so grateful for these past eight years of ranch living- for the gradually accumulated menagerie of cats, dogs, chickens, goats, horses, ducks, and even our pet turkey, sprinkled with the love and laughter of our family of six! What a gift.
Second Life took a whole new meaning towards the end of 2010. Not only did I open up my very own (first) store, but I met someone that has become a staple in my life… be it real or virtual.
Who are your friends? And how did they come to be so? According to a recent study people like to make friends with others who share their same beliefs, values and interests, and the more choices they have, the more likely they are to choose these kinds of friends
We cannot cough it out.
you feel his arms around you, but you know it's just air?
Seriously. Please watch the video.
Some wonderful samples from the design team--still creating despite the merriment of last week!
The central claim of campaigners is that the bags kill more than 100,000 marine mammals and one million seabirds every year. However, this figure is based on a misinterpretation of a 1987 Canadian study in Newfoundland, which found that, between 1981 and 1984, more than 100,000 marine mammals, including birds, were killed by discarded nets. The Canadian study did not mention plastic bags.
Of course the rules must apply – adhere to licencing in the area, make sure the minors don’t get a swig and there is a specific rule that prohibits the bride, groom and witnesses from being under the influence (at the discretion of the celebrant)… but at the end of the day, if your day feels “right” with a few sips of bubbly with your friends – then go for it!
So, see you all tomorrow and remember to tell your friends... come on now, we can't be selfish we have to play nice and share (for all of those who don't win the free copy I will have another treat in store but all about that tomorrow)!
The decision, taken after what Mr Darby described as a “sensible and rational debate” means that the party is now in compliance with the London County Court order.
On this one, the kids choose a color to fill in each section. They can fill it in with any color they choose. However, on some of the pictures, they didn't think too hard about where they put all of those letters! But most of them are very good, particularly since this is a FREE app! But... sometimes it can be hard to tell which letters are the capitals and which are the lower case- even for an adult. For example, there isn’t much of a visual difference between the capital K and the lower case K, etc.
So I believe we go into parenting based on what we see others do, how we were raised of course, and by the very NEEDS of our children- if we take the time to listen to those needs.
the venus and the pottery
Now the idea of card companions is to make one entire card from the sheet without the need to use anything else..did that happen...NO!
Gordon Lightfoot - Circle Of Steel
“A number of local businesses have closed of their own volition and we will continue to work closely with them.”
M ove out of “Camp Complaining”
I know, deep down inside, that despite being gifted, both kids have some level of weakness in their executive functioning - you know, the higher order skills in being able to sort through thoughts, hold them in their heads, organise them and put them on paper. On being organised enough to not run late every week for swimming. To know how to tidy up their room. I know that they struggle with these things. Whether or not they are severe enough to count as the inattentive type of ADHD we are waiting until May (which is how long you have to wait to get to see a specialist).
ND - But they, if we wish to stop clubs doing that the way to do it is to heavily punish clubs who go into administration on the first place, not just the 10-point penalty. That’s the way to do it, rather than look at what happens after administration.
After having seen the contents of the link, we agreed to upload.
Former governor of Alaska and the mother of Bristol Palin has joined the Fox ‘News’ Channel as a commentator, reports said.
At least the Klitschkos seemed to find it funny, you'll see in the video clip above that they clearly are not bothered by the whole thing. They're fighters, why would they be?
This is commonly known as the unpardonable sin and many fear they have committed it. But, let’s take a look at it. Was it referring to individuals? Did Saul of Tarsus commit the unpardonable sin? Was he not present when Stephen was stoned to death? He said he was. The record in Acts 8:1 attests to that fact. “And Saul was consenting unto his death.” Did he commit the unpardonable sin? Obviously not, for he was later forgiven and saved.
Well that sounds like a party.
Location on Google Map
i found this lovely cashmere cardigan
Dave and my mom.
5 The Big Payback 4:35
large battered brew kettle. He is aided by a beatup tread-robot
Winter: satire. Anti-utopias, inverted worlds, the embrace of the tundra: the embrace of wintry thoughts.
Paper place mats are always my choice for a large group. I got these scrapbook papers at Hobby Lobby, 5 for $1. I wanted them to look like Dorothy's basket, and I think they came close.
Our final character dining experience was the one place we visit each time we are at Walt Disney World - Chef Mickey's located in the Contemporary Hotel. We always get one of the last seatings of the morning for "brunch". Plenty of great selections on this amazing breakfast buffet - we always leave filled up!
Running for just a single season, 'The Monroes' consisted of 26 episodes – the fourth of which, entitled 'The Forest Devil', was the wolverine episode that had played such a key role in kindling my interest in cryptozoology as a youngster and had afterwards teased and tantalised my mind for over four decades.
“Nothing”
Good Morning!! Yaaah, I have yet another card to share!! I dug into my new supplies and used the Fabulous Florets stamp set from the Summer Mini. This beautiful stamp set also made the new Idea Book & Catalogue, which we were all very pleased to see.
Stay tuned for mo info Ya-ha TheAnimationers
Rick and I skipped out on church and attended a brunch New Members class in a beautiful part of the atrium called the Great Hall. It was in the middle of this class that the pager began buzzing.
Half term's gone haywire here. Poor Miss S has been struck by a nasty cold, and has spent much time since Saturday in bed feeling sorry for herself. She's definitely fighting it though - one minute she's flaked out in bed, the next she's up and dancing round the lounge to her music - and then she flakes out again! Talk about up and down - it's like having two different children in the house.
I waited in the recovery area for about an hour. There again the nurses were super friendly, helpful and knowledgeable. The doctor came in after to check on me and give me a final report on what was retrieved.
I loved it. Loved, loved, loved. And not like "love that goes away because it's really just a passing infatuation." OHHHH NO, this is real love. Real bookish, all-time favorite, gooey love.
I do typical dad things like eat grape nuts and post pictures of my kid with a fake mustache on facebook.
“Who is he?” came a voice from within the room.
Morning Pages
1/2 and english cucumber, chopped
but these are surprisingly good.
We both got married, divorced, and then remarried. We both have two kids. We both still have tendinitis, his in his Achilles tendon, mine in my left knee, except it's a lot worse for both of us now. Both of us wonder if some day, our failing body parts are going to get their wish, and we'll hang up the racing flats for good. We talk about our failed marriages in hushed tones, using stock phrases people use like "it was just a difficult situation" to avoid saying too much about the dark places we've endured. We talk about the happiness our kids bring.
What is exactly on the cover of your album?
Go on, do you're little happy dance. I have one too. No shame, no shame at all.
Andrews sat alone in the dug-out and watched BTC go into a two-nil first-half lead. Both goals were followed by inquiries amongst some of our players. Paul listened to them blame each other for the goals, shouting things like: 'Why wasn't he closed down?' and 'That's your job.' Things got worse in the second-half. BTC took advantage of space on their right to make it three-nil, but there were still twenty minutes left, and given the scoreline, perhaps a suitable time to warrant a substitution. Ben Rowe is put on first and makes an instant impact. Sam Schwodler then edone away, after being put through by a long punt from goalkeeper, Ryan Jones. Rowe was then pushed in the penalty area. Kristian Hewitt slotted in the penalty. With around ten minutes left the game was nicely poised.
“I’ve learnt a lot so far with Lotus F1 Team, and this is just the beginning.”
I have written before about my love of French black metal. I have never been to France, so I don’t know what it is about that fair country that provides us with such quality black metal, but this is definitely the grade A good stuff. This is what black metal should sound like. This is how black metal should make you feel. Hopeless. Haunted. Forlorn. The music is menacing, virulent, and vehement. There is no doubt about how these guys feel about life on planet Earth when you listen to this music. Any effort that can make you feel things to this degree is worth taking note of, whether you actually like the particular genre of music or not. Music should take you somewhere and make you feel. Maybe that’s what makes this stuff so good.
Regardless, I have my tree... but no decorations...
Frogger Helmet ChaosFrogger Helmet Chaos
A bit further down, I pass a rather handsome crow perched in a bare (tornado-damaged) tree. He doesn't mind my snapping him on the fly, but when I turn around and stop to get a better shot, he immediately flies away. A bashful fellow.
As Peter Drucker reminded us, “If you always do what you’ve always done, you’ll always get what you’ve always got”.
Nothing the clerk provided was suitable.
The pictures really don’t do the injuries justice, but for the most part I am okay. I was so mad about not finishing up my ride but decided to cut my losses and just get cleaned up for the night. After all I did have a long trail run to get in, and was hoping that this was not a sign of things to come.
Someone who is funny and honest and open.
I don't want to do this anymore week.
How long will it take to ask
Jeeze, they tell me to clean up the messes I make but how do they expect me to do so if I can’t
If any of this applies to your Congressperson or Senator, feel free to copy, past and use it. I'm sure they will appreciate hearing from you!
A: It’s different because the technologies we have to work with in the first half of the 21st century are much different than the technologies that will exist in the 23rd century when Star Trek is set. We can only dream of what technologies may exist by then. So we can stay as true to the themes of the Enterprise ship as is possible given our technological limitations. We have to re-configure interior sections of the ship quite a bit. But it will still be a magnificently impressive ship. When completed, and given the missions that it will be capable of doing, it will be as inspirational as putting astronauts on the moon in 1969.
The happiness I felt at finding Heaven subdued the terror. I listened inward to sense the right direction, and soon found the right path again.
However, I'm not going to talk about him here. You can listen to the show on Resonance FM on the 30th April instead (I'll remind you closer to the time). What I am going to talk about here is another denizen of the Amazon, the candiru fish. Of all the weird and wonderful things I've had to research recently, this little bugger proved to be the most slippery and difficult to get a hold on.
Susan wished he’d do a trick now, but maybe you couldn’t do magic when someone had just died.
JR: What advice would you give to grade 11 students to help them with the IB programme?
CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION (CDC). Prevention and control of influenza: recommendations of the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices (ACIP). MMWR Morb Mortal Wkly Rep 2005; 54 (RR-8): 1-40.
Natalie calls Paul over, and shows him the items she found. Before they can discuss their next move, Wexler returns and enters the office, leaving the couple trapped in the hidden room. As they listen to him leave, Paul and Natalie try to escape, only to find Wexler waiting for them.
And my boobs do look quite good in a sports bra
Turn again 3/4" and press in place
Unfortunately, the logistical difficulties would be fairly considerable, to put it mildly, and would undoubtedly necessitate the preparatory internment of the entire Muslim population. This could not be achieved without the massive application of brute force, and would be a process likely to spiral out of control given the numbers of people in question.
This was straight up bullying.
Then again, we could always capture a new dream,
Pudding
Technology makes it possible for nature to be destroyed – eaten up deliberately or even by accident.
'I heard there was a bitter hatred between Conservative American working men and Liberal Democrat hippies, but now I've seen with my own eyes that this is not true.'
The chooks were nowhere to be seen, but offended chuntering was coming from the coop. I still couldn't see the puppy. Rounding the corner of the house, I heard a commotion coming from the garage and discovered a desperately flapping Gladys trying to achieve higher ground while a jubilant puppy yapped and jumped below her. The pup, being only 14 weeks old, is not great at following commands so my 'No! Leave it!' fell on floppy but deaf ears. In the end, I snagged the furry terrorist by the collar and hauled him in to the house. Shutting him in, I dashed back to Gladys's aid.
sleep
You can level up your character in various abilities (stealth/guns/hacking/martial arts etc) to help you along the way which means most people are likely to get a different experience during their time with the game.
Chlorella is a single-celled, water-grown green alga that contains the highest chlorophyll level per ounce of any plant. Who cares? Well, you should.
MH: Easie definitely has a tongue on him. Darker characters or what is becoming known as gritty, grey, and ambiguous characters have been on the rise in Fantasy the last decade and Easie seems to fit in that somewhere. When you were growing up what characters in Fantasy were you interested in? More of the reluctant born hero types like Aragon? Or someone who wants to do good, but isn't above doing a bit of evil to get their way? Or just an out and out bastard?
A quick lunch later and I was wanting to get out. I have been housebound for the last few weeks as I have had lots to do at home. Because Blenheim Lodge is a decent size of house and there is countryside at the back of the house with far-reading Lake and mountain views from the front of the house, I do not feel claustrophobic if I don’t get out. However, I really wanted to get out today because I found out that Kendal library was open even though it is a Sunday. I needed to return some books and thought I would look around to see if there would be any that I would like to borrow.
Suffering from insomnia because I’m scared of stopping doing something I loathe doing anyway has got to be the world’s stupidest reason to fail an exam. Although I suppose I could always get lost on the way there – since it’s in a building about thirty metres from where I live, that’d be even stupider.
Guess what? There was NO difference in flavor or texture from substituting Brown Rice Flour for the White Flour. So simple and stress-free!
We passed Golden Gate
Requirement: Must hold unlimited DP certificate and have experience on DSV’s and diving support operations involving dynamic positioning.
If you’re like me, you maybe haven’t heard of this award before. You may also wonder if it’s somehow connected to Bieber (it sounds so similar, right?!?). Essentially, from what I have gleaned from the internet through research that didn’t include any Wikipedia page, it’s an award given to bloggers with less than 200 followers by other bloggers who enjoy your blog. Once you’ve been given the award, you thank the nominating blogger on your blog and award 5 Liebster awards to your favorite blogs.
The paper towel was covered in blood. I blame the nurse but when I examined the band-aid later it was soaked too.
against love
“Will do.”
1. Small crowd of 6 thousand
The pleasurable thoughts didn’t last long, morphing inexplicably into the memory of a film Lawrence had shown her once, his attempt to get into film school, a laboured and frankly tedious series of re-enactments of the climactic scene from The Brown Bunny with Lawrence himself in the hallowed Vincent Gallo position and a variety of desperate or otherwise pliable young ladies from the local sixth form college eager to augment their tuition fees by taking on the Chloë Sevigny role, taken from a variety of angles and shot in quite bewildering High Definition detail. Unfortunately Lawrence had neither the build nor camera and lighting skills to pull it off successfully and the three-hour-plus compilation of clips and outtakes had singularly failed to land him a place at his college of choice. Undeterred, he had continued to send out copies to any institution he thought might be interested, not to mention any hapless female visitor who happened to wander into his flat of an evening, until finally common sense took the upper hand and Lawrence found himself the wide-eyed subject of a Customs and Excise raid. They seized computers and dubbing equipment, and, thankfully, his master copies, which meant that Ophelia might at long last banish the thought of those hairy thighs and horrendous boxer shorts from her mind, but sadly not today, it would seem.
Luke 21:33
The warmth of her soft lips as they wrapped around my hardened outstretched flesh was electrifying. My nipples are hardwired to my cock and prostate, so the jolt of pleasure from her mouth crackled around my areola and shot down my spine with the speed of light; when it reached my anus it rushed into the opening and drilled into my prostate causing it to thump and swell. In response my pulsing prostate sent a sympathetic wave of desperate erotic sensation to stream along from my anus to the base of my cock and rush to the tip of my cockhead were it sparkled and tingled and danced all over the tip like sparks on Van de Graff Generator, causing my cock to harden instantly. In moments, pre cum began to drool from my trembling slit. In the process my cock thumped around on her belly like a great fish that had just been caught and was flopping around on the deck of a boat.
Here is a sneak peak of what went on over the border!
Consider the many ways this President has found everyone else to blame for his failures. Oil prices were blamed on the “uncertainty about what’s going on in Iran and the Middle East”, but prices stayed moderate during all the years of conflict in Afghanistan and Iraq.
5. Your Favorite song? right now it’s Weekend by The Smith Westerns….all time it’s Lucky Man by the Verve
I watched 'Driving Miss Daisy' last night, home alone,
Lyndsee has the ability to mold and push her face into the most abstract cartoonish expressions. She suffers from Ehlers-Danlos Syndrome (EDS) also known as Cutis Hyperelastica. This rare genetic disease results in the defective production of collagen which breaks down the ability to hold the skin together. Because of this, she has become the class clown. She gets the kids rolling with her "bat wings" impression where she clasps her checks and spans them out like wings on the side of her face. This is only one of her many infamous impressions including "choking crane" "bloated frog" and "smiling anteater".
Pivovar Rakovnik Bakalar Svetlý Ležák
Carrot Cake Cupcakes with Cream Cheese Frosting
You want and want, unruly imp,
I have to ‘do something’ with this Jesus who gave us a glimpse of what this transformed earth and life will be like in the raising of Lazarus. This Jesus who does things like raise people from the dead is not safe and cannot be domesticated. He is unruly and out of control: no one stands up to the biggest bully in town. People are typically content to let the bully have his way, and death was content to continue owning every street corner in town. Jesus came along and changed all that.
“We cannot accept this: the Government must be more daring and less risk forces by tackling the criteria for ODA, so that more money goes to the world’s poorest people and the poorest countries, and less to the European neighbourhood,” said Mr Bruce.
The fruits and chopped vegetables are then mixed in a bowl with slightly spicy shrimp paste tossed with grounded nuts. This can be found in some coffee shops, food courts and some food stalls, but some of the food bloggers can tell you that this is simple enough to be made at home as long as one is able to get hold of a bottle of the shrimp paste which can be found in supermarkets and bazaars.
What do our dear lords do? They take it for a mere jest. It is a fact that the Turk is at our throat, and even if he does not will to march against us this year, yet he is there, armed and ready any hour to attack us, when he will, and yet our princes discuss, meanwhile, how they can harass Luther and the Gospel. It is the Turk! Against it force must be used! It must be put out! That is what they are doing right now at Speyer, making the greatest ado about the eating of meat and fish, and foolishness like that.
Kegged: 05-24-2008
All those done, a 'Doa Selamat' as a sign of things smoothly done will take place.
Our cattle are rotated through organically-managed pastures and have free-choice access to an organic salt, mineral and kelp supplement. They are fed absolutely no grain, hormones or antibiotics.
Now I'm off to enjoy the sunshine (with sunscreen on of course Mom)
Soon, the sun will arc a bit westward and provide a shady relief to permit the yardwork I must do. Trooper hasn't the time and it is so out of hand...and the labor will surely relieve the melancholy. It always does. Hard work is a fine cure for nearly any ill of the spirit. If nothing else, it makes you grateful that it isn't your daily lot in life.
Exploring possibilities, to my mind, is what learning is all about. Playing is often defined as engaging in some (idle) activity for pleasurable purposes rather than serious ones. That is, playing for serious purposes seems to be a contradiction in terms – though one wonders what to make of the “playing” in golf and bridge tournaments, or of playing video games for a living. Add to that the idea that learning is a serious endeavour, which should be seriously managed by serious policy-makers, and we end up with the conviction that learning must be achieved through boring activities, because achievement takes 99 parts transpiration to one part inspiration, and where there’s no pain there’s no gain, that sort of thing. Children’s spontaneous learning tells us a different story: it is precisely because learning is such a serious activity that play plays such an important role in it.
Lastly, much to my disgust, I am often surrounded with “Christian” peers that have demanded various material luxuries from God, and have sustained the theory: “God will provide for me because I have faith in Him and he knows that. And since He said so himself in the Bible that he always blesses those who have faith in Him, I will get that $10,000 donation to go on my trip to Germany for three months.” Ohhh…my goodness.
Unsurprisingly, authors rarely get any say in the design of their book jackets (although some independent presses are fantastic about listening to their authors when it comes to jacket design). The major retailers will have more say in the design of the book jacket than an individual author will: if a senior book buyer doesn’t like a jacket it will almost always be redesigned.
A Merry Life: Sweet and comforting vanilla beans infused with cream, star anise, pink pepperberry, and tarnished ever-so-slightly by worn leather boots, chimney smoke, and tobacco tar.
My husband ordered "Mushroom bread pudding". Ever since he had mushroom bread pudding at the Standard Hotel in Manhattan last year (Click here for that post) he order this dish every chance he gets.
So this is just a general apology and small update. Hopefully I can get back to life as usual soon. Probably not, as this move has dredged up emotions and things I’ve been trying to ignore, as big life changes often do.
Come join us in celebrating Girl Power and Breast Cancer Awareness month! We will have 10 designers, which are fabulous join this special Blog Hop:
The NJC refused to accept Justice Salami’s court summons for days. When the NJC finally accepted the summons, it claimed in newspaper ads that the summons was neither signed nor dated amidst speculations that NJC doctored the writs of summons.
Ramblin’ Man–The Allman Brothers
How far along: 30 weeks
If you comment on today's post on this blog or any of the other blogs participating in Everybody's Talking About Wicked Good People, you will be entered to win a print copy of Wicked Good by Amy Lewis Faircloth and Joanne Lewis. To read about Amy and Joanne's Special People and view the list of participating blogs please visit The Muffin http://muffin.wow-womenonwriting.com/
Yes, I said bribe.
We are already talking about things we need to do before we start the trek for home. We will have been here 2 months which is great. And we have done a lot of things while here and already can start looking forward to next January and our next 2 months here.
The first problem I have with this commercial are the stereotypes Coors draws on to create the “bar” scene in this man’s living room. A man is serving beer at the “bar” while the woman is walking around passing out snacks, acting as the sort of cocktail waitress in the scene, in a position below the male bartender. But hey, this is a man’s world and I can deal with that. In fact, it’s more likely than not that this would be the scenario in real life, and I’m absolutely not offended by reality. Even if you can get past this almost chauvinist set up though, they hit you with a little stereotypical racism, and have a big black guy acting as the bouncer. I think the little tropes Coors has created in this scene are typical of the way the type of person who limits themselves to Coors thinks anyway.
I was not compensated for this review, but as a Saline Ambassador I am provided with free samples and products to hand out and for my own use.
We liked the artwork so much that we had a number of pieces blown up and put onto canvas to brighten up our entrance hall.
Like Su-Jen, however, my identity changed as I grew. English became my dominant language and my Spanish vocabulary was so limited, that I actually had to make an extra effort to learn words for school (and slang) when I returned to Venezuela. When I returned to my native country I felt like an outsider. Even today, I know that my experiences as a child have given me a unique point of view into my native culture: as an insider but also as an outsider. I also had been exposed to many different cultures in my international school, which gave me a different view of the world compared to those of my all-Venezuelan classmates. This type of evolution of the child character is what gives the story so much depth.
Hello and Welcome back!!! I hope you all hopped along with us yesterday, if not you can just go through both days now and check out all the wonderful creations.
If you haven’t seen it, Clint Eastwood plays a growling, bitter, bigoted, recently widowed veteran of the Korean War. He lives defiantly in his longtime home as the neighborhood around him falls into blight and becomes an incubator for gangs of all ethnicities.
We clambered to our feet and began the journey again, and though I walked beside them, I was still trying to come to grips with all of this. My destiny, my exile, my life. My reality had bled into the dream and become a reality itself. The sorrow for how I had treated Mother, my rage against THE BASTARD, the destruction of Lamia and the Omphalos, all of it came rushing at me, taunting me.
Rojas: You use different “persons” (1st person, 3rd person, etc.) for you different characters? Why did you chose this method?
Democrats demonize their opponents as being hateful and greedy. And then Democrats cynically assure the poorest and most needy and most ignorant that they will help those people and make their lives better.
Have you ever seen a dove?
final (optional) seasonings:
Further Information
For the next 10 minutes do not speak or use any sign language. Observe how the dynamics of the group affect the drift when you don’t communicate verbally.
The dispatch noted that Bencomo’s comments were a sign that Havana would use the meeting to “hammer” at the U.S. wet-foot, dry-foot policy, which allows Cubans who reach U.S. land to stay. Cuba has long criticized the policy, but the cables didn’t indicate whether Havana indeed attacked the policy at the immigration talks.
And so here is my interview with Mister Southwick. Enjoy.
Cautions include a tendency toward indiscreet communications and a wish to ‘breeze through life’ on the strength of a quick wit even though he has a need to ‘know it all’.
Today is my birthday. 29 years of fun. Its been a really great day, starting off with breakfast with my husband, lunch with a great friend, and even a surprise mini celebration from my first graders! It was great! I even made some AMAZING 'made from scratch' cupcakes with amazing 'made from scratch' frosting. BEST. CUPCAKES. EVER.
To put a little Holiday Cheer on your desktop, download MacLampsX. This simple app runs in the background and puts a border of Christmas lights, snowflakes, or holly around your screen. All of the lights are customizable, and it’s extremely functional for a free app. To download it, click this link: http://bit.ly/MacLampsX
My mother gave me a very special gift today, she gave me my grandmother's engagement ring. Still in it's original box from Ritter's Jewellers and Watchmakers, Port Elizabeth & Grahamstown.
Just put her down for bed:
With releases on noted tech-house labels Get Physical, Monique Music and Noir, their latest fascination for psychedelic nostalgia, classic drum kits, elongated guitar solos and sticky vocals, which owes much to their parents’ 60s wax collection, bleeds in to a steady 4/4 pattern, yet dodges genre piegonholing. “It’s more about a feeling than a label. At the end of the day, we play house,” Anstascia says.
So, what am I doing you ask. Nothing earth shattering. I know there are a lot of great programs out there. Many ask that you order their food, or eat a restricted regimen, but I knew that for me to do this it had to be somewhat flexible and not a bunch of "rules". I'm doing a "shake" meal replacement twice a day and then for dinner eating only a small portion of meat, veggies, or a salad. Basically it's "The Zone" diet but with two shakes a day that are low carbs and high protein, and a snack or two that are also low carbohydrate. (no sugar, no boxed or packaged or processed food except kosher crackers, no starches, just a little fresh or frozen fruit)
gravel roads
Between the snow falling at Christmas and the recent horrendous weather that has left me feeling depressed and hibernatory, Mrs H3 and I went to see Sherlock Holmes starring Robert Downey Jr. Now I’ve never really enjoyed a Guy Ritchie film before, in fact I’m not entirely sure that I’ve ever seen one as they’re really not my cup of tea, but the combination of classic detective and sexy actor had me intrigued enough to go. And I loved it. I can honestly say that it’s one of the few films that I’ve seen in the last year that I would happily return to the cinema to watch again and again. Robert Downey Jr is excellent as a grimy sort of Holmes, who might not be awfully canon, but sure makes for good entertainment and because of the subject matter Ritchie wasn’t able to put too much of his gangster stuff into it, but did still bring the fights and explosions. A visual feast (and not just RDJ), exciting and with a half decent story too. I’d definitely recommend it.
add a dash of olive oil to a hot frying pan and cook salmon fillets to desired doneness on medium-low heat.
My computer was doing it automatically for me, and I didn't realise it was using the wrong one. :(
Yes its fair. Is it fair to punish the violator of a law? Should the punishment fit the crime? If you see in the newspaper a man getting a small $20.00 fine for an infraction you would assume that the infraction was petty or small. When you find out the fine was for raping and murdering 10 woman in cold blood you would be outraged, as we all would be.
H2O—a fascinating allegorical look at success,
Freddie Mercury died on November 24, 1991. It's been 20 years today and the world is a little less spectacular with his absense.
Hambly silver and white cloud overlay
The talks/discussions I'll be doing/moderating myself are as follows:
I am going to post the first one, in its entirety (don't hyperventilate, it's only 8 pages), tomorrow. Can I get an "amen!" for the lovely Miz' Barb?
ok, not to set myself up for failure and/or additional anxiety, it will get done when it's done. i'm moving on november 6th.
Add three cups of the chicken stock, the salt and pepper. Bring the pot back to a simmer, stirring frequently until the stock is absorbed. Then add the remaining stock in two installments and cook until the rice is al dente. You will want to use all the stock.
"Fuck."
- New ‘Now Playing’ full-screen view with high-definition cover art
I could. I could see myself in the mirror or see my hand or feel my head.
This period of history has been written about, staged and televised more times than any of us can contemplate. We all know how it ends and , and so that makes Mantel's story-telling even more impressive. Never once was I bored when reading this book; I was always at the edge of my seat, even though I knew, knew all along, exactly how the story would end. In my review of Wolf Hall, I speculated that in this sequel, we would leave behind the idealistic and kind Thomas Cromwell Mantel revealed to the world and meet the hardened and more ruthless Cromwell that history remembers. In a way, that is true. Here, Cromwell is successful. "But whenever good fortune has called on him, he has been there, planted on the threshold, ready to fling open the door to her timid scratch on the wood." He is pragmatic. "It is not so much, who is guilty, as whose guilt is of service to you." He is vengeful. "...[this is not about] one year's grudge or two but a fat extract from the book of grief, kept since the cardinal came down."
But back to Minnesota. The Minnesota legislature shares the burden for the government shut down – the Republican-controlled legislature would rather cut services on Minnesota’s most vulnerable populations than require millionaires to pay a bit more. And why not? We are, after all, living in a very Dickensian time. Please sir, may I have just a bit more of that day-old porridge sitting at the bottom of the pot? Hell no – and besides, we’re putting that pot away on the back shelf – and charging you for the storage fees too!
Evernote
How sweet it is to be loved by you
Good God
yesterday, i worked on lori may's room with her at the nicholas house (for the non-profit organization that we have all joined called "room service atlanta"). i volunteered my painting services to the designers that are working there, and lori has the most beautiful room planned. i saw some of what she has done already, and can't wait to see the room in it's final stage!
Anchored in the middle of a 3-store strip mall it provides a haven to hungry travelers. The interior has more in common with the farmland that surrounds the small strip mall then the empty store to either side. It’s interior will provide some sustenance to the soul for those of us who hanker for ‘when times were simpler’ and the food matches the décor. Everything is retro-fun! This is more than road food… this is a deliciously simple lunch menu that packs a wallop to the taste buds, and a dream-come-true for those of us
Some amendments to one-year visa requirements are going to change things for missionaries in Russia, as well as for other foreigners here with the same kind of visa.
And gives an example. “If you change your husband’s name and your husband’s doctor name, but not your own, and write slander against the doctor, the doctor can still sue you for slander.”
tell her.... somebody isn't a mother.
There are countless men who made invaluable contribution, not only to the beer’s taste, but to its survival as a profitable venture. The most important of which is that of the founder, Sr. Enrique Maria Barretto y Ycaza. He sought the approval of the Spanish Queen for his beer during a time when the monarch was dealing with so many issues and problem plaguing her empire. Barretto had his eyes in supplying beer to South East Asia. With his Royal grant, he begun the first ever beer brewery in the region – “La Fabrica de Cerveza de San Miguel”.
A bit of a different challenge, for you this month. Is there a crafter you are inspired by? They can be famous, or not so famous. Are they just one of those crafters who you just keep going back to.
To my surprise, the man expressed his willingness to treat with me, and suggested that I might have the carcase at the rate of 4s 11¾d. a pound. Considering the price not excessive, I agreed, and, having weighed the horse at an automatic weighing machine, I handed over £100 in notes. Then the first strange thing happened. Before I could replace my pocket book in its receptable in my coat, the driver had absolutely vanished! I could not see him anywhere. I was the more annoyed at this, as I found that (by mistake) I had given him notes on the Bank of Elegance, which everyone knows are of less value than notes on the Bank of England. However, it was too late to search for the vendor, and I walked away as I could, leading by the bridle the steed I had so recently acquired.
Soon, I will fade
There was what appeared to be a force ten gale howling in from the North Sea
For instance,
The stories of these chaplains, practical Priests in their communities, were absolutely inspiring.
Given the perspective of the forest floor from the bluff, this trail is likely a great place to see fall colors; and in winter the views of Lake Higgins’ backwaters are undoubtedly better. No matter the time of year, you’ll want to take your time on this trail to appreciate the forest around you since there is little in the way of unobstructed lake views or other highlights.
Shake your chains to earth like dew
Do you have an interesting experience, photo, link or video to share? How about a problem to fix, compliment to give or just something you want to vent on and get off your chest about living on Roosevelt Island?
"Listen to me, you gooey son of a bitch. You're gonna tell us what you're building here, or I'm gonna wash your mouth out with soap." Hee.
Submission to God
4 tsp of dill seeds.
"We urge authorities to seek alternatives in terms of a back-up system, so that this service is uninterrupted and calls can be diverted in the event of unforeseen problems."
And then he was off. He didn’t wait for my answer.
Behold the silvery river, in it the splashing horses loitering stop
Auckland, New Zealand
Picture a Verdi opera: 3 hours of music, some of beautiful and ennobling, at times piquant and subtle, other times dramatic and inspiring. Take those three hours of music, those thousands of musical notes, and compress them into 4 measures of incomprehensible speed, delivered with earth-shaking finesse and a raucous disregard for any physiological limit to human auditory perception. I cannot stress this enough: I will play guitar so fast your face will melt.
It was a very nice party and I wish I had remembered earlier that I had my camera with me. Then I could have shown you my editor Emma Matthewson, who made a very nice speech and has edited all seven novels so far that I have written for Bloomsbury, Ian lamb, who organised the party and all my publicity and Susannah Nuckey, head of Children's Marketing, who surprised me with the lovely poster that has Troubadour on one side and all the Stravaganzas on the back.
1. People turning up at the centre, drawn in supernaturally in response to prayer! Time and time again, testimonies from the book begin…
The petals may be a bit on the droopy side so use some of the kitchen towel (Shred them a bit.) to support the back of the petals until they dry.
Chag Sameach!
Spaghetti, one serving, boiled in hot water until soft
in the drooping of the day
Last Monday, Madison and Olivia had their first day of Pre-K. They are growing up way too quickly for me! It's hard to believe that I have one more year of preschool before I'll be sending them off to Kindergarten. Sniff...
Designer Georgina Chapman looked elegant in her own Marchesa design. I loved this sleek, pure white dress, with embroidered shoulders and peplum bodice. It looked outstanding on the red carpet. The peplum added curve to her slender figure.
I would like to play with the digital version because these albums do take up space, but I’m not sure I’m ready to give them up just yet. We’ll see.
So what movie am I talking about that has to do with this and Lolita? A little princess, which tells us to be good to others and believe in our dreams and selves? Kamikaze girls ( which I admit I've never watched, eep! ) or some other feel good happy G rated movie made for a younger audience? WRONG!
Potok further concedes that his information is “anecdotal” and that up to 20% of his groups can’t be found. The actual number is 26%, assuming all of the other “groups” actually exist. In fact, last year Mr. Potok bumped the number of alleged “hate groups” up by 70 and yet the number of homeless “hate groups” jumped by 99 for the same time period!
(Now i've written this, i'm wondering what sort of formal research/evidence would be necessary to try to turn it into some sort of formal proposal to the NAS (or whoever is the most appropriate "authority") to redefine the "triad" - if of course there's sufficient autistic-community support for it. Any ideas?)
This might be what I need to get me back in line
PS And if you are single and longing to be a mom ~ don't let being single stop you...
We seem to have been sucked into the Camp Bastion Triangle for the past few days, just waiting to find a way out of this groundhog series of events that each morning brings us.
6.How has Dover changed from when Tristan was there last? What do you think happened to this thriving town?
1) First wet some tissue papers (3 to 4 pieces) and put them at the base of your rice cooker pot. Then put the eggs on top of the wet tissue papers.
Sadie x
they threaten to rise up take my throat
2010.09.18 Iraq Mosul 1 0 A civilian is brought down by Sunni gunmen.
I laughed at the fact that I ended up on the bed instead of my tub.
Its lambs were all alone.
Jacket (Bonspiel, consignment), t-shirt (not showing, Threadless), skirt (Club Monaco, consignment), belt (Gap), shoes (Jeffrey Campbell), earrings (Plum), ring (Wendy Brandes).
“Black and Asian people are like a spreading cancer ... There are no-go areas in Halifax, where I have lived all my life, where white people daren’t go even with their cars ... All immigration must stop ... The country is full up. We don’t want people like that here. They have a different attitude to life. They are not wanting to adopt our ways of life.”
Angie Zublionis
1-6 Free-bass (Godzillatron Cush)
2nd step
If I have momentum it is easier to continue
The latter subject is one that I feel particularly strongly about, and although I commented over on the RMW post at the time, I wanted to give my tuppence worth here on my home turf as well.
13. The fact that it involves three Whedons and musical numbers makes it pretty much the most awesome thing to ever exist in this or any other universe.
This is a short, hardback book which should really be considered an essay. It is less than 50 pages, including picture and large print. While I wouldn’t recommend that it’s well worth the retail price of $15, I do think that the message is well worth considering. Andrews is a Christian novelist with eloquent literacy, and though he takes the middle path to speak to a wide audience, his point is straight and narrow.
The best part for me was the chairs in this fancy room were all wide, probably as wide as two children can fit and recliners that can go almost horizontal with a foot rest. If a regular theater is economy class on an airplane, this theater was definitely business class. You don’t have to worry about bumping your arm with your neighbors because there is a mini table between chairs. Don’t go there when you’re sleepy because you could fall asleep in the chair since it is so comfortable.
I am the baby of the family, it happens, so
Since 1970, Earth Day celebrations have grown. In 1990, Earth Day went global, with 200 million people in over 140 nations participating, according to the Earth Day Network (EDN), a nonprofit organization that coordinates Earth Day activities. In 2000, Earth Day focused on clean energy and involved hundreds of millions of people in 184 countries and 5,000 environmental groups, according to EDN. Activities ranged from a traveling, talking drum chain in Gabon, Africa, to a gathering of hundreds of thousands of people at the National Mall in Washington, D.C. Today, the Earth Day Network collaborates with more than 17,000 partners and organizations in 174 countries. According to EDN, more than 1 billion people are involved in Earth Day activities, making it “the largest secular civic event in the world.”
We know that the fifth fleet in Bahrain patrols the borders between Iran and Bahrain. Bahrain is a strategic point and important to the US. We also know that the EU and US have been pushing Iran to allow the International Atomic Energy Agency (IAEA) to do a follow up on Iran to gather evidence that Iran has its nuclear plant to provide nuclear energy without building nuclear weapons. Every time this question is brought up, Iran doesnt care about what the international community thinks. It reached a point where in late february 2012, Israel made it clear that the program is on going and Iran is still building nuclear weapons. The EU are asking the UN to continue to put pressure on Iran to the point where the US put sactions on Iran to force them to stop their nuclear program. So far, the US is a big enemy to Iran and vice versa. It seems like the US didnt intend to hand Iraq over to the persians to control. But…. This is the part that really sucks….The latest release of wikileaks’ GI Files that consists of 5 million emails is quite scary to even read and here’s why:
How's that for vague?
Well I was able to preserve the mystery for a while and anyway, luckily for me, he had quite a few other tricks up his sleeve.
You know this part of Easter is disturbing to me when Jesus shows a temper first in the temple than directed towards the fig tree he withered for life.
Luke: Yes Mommy, they clean dirty cars off with their big hoses.
The other, far more annoying in its widespread usage and its physical effect on me is what I used to call sleepy voice. Sometimes Chloe would phone me early in the morning and while she spoke, I cleared my throat. Repeatedly. So much so that if MathMan was in the room, he'd ask me if I had a problem.
But my novel is a journey and the school is only one of the several worlds that Gemma inhabits. She grows up, much more quickly than I did, and is forced to earn her own living which leads to adventures good and bad.Learn more about the book and author at Margot Livesey's website and Facebook page.
There is also the “experience” version of Wish You Were Here, featuring an early live version of “Shine On You Crazy Diamond,” also recorded in 1974 at Wembley. Though labeled as Parts 1 – 6, it is actually nearly finished up to Part 8 (the studio album is book-ended with “Shine On (Parts 1-5)” and “Shine On (Parts 6-9)”). Even more interesting are lengthy embryonic live versions of “Sheep” and “Dogs,” from the 1977 Animals album, presented alternately as “Raving and Drooling” and “You Gotta Be Crazy,” recorded at the same show.
She paid attention to him! She stopped texting. She stopped talking. She made direct eye contact…something just north of a glare but stopping just shy of a full-on stare down…and when he finally looked up…his head narrowly missing the icicles she was shooting his way…he was caught in her gaze!
Congrats to her! I will contact Debbie by e-mail and get it sent out right away!
Moments away from letting my day go into a downward spiral.
I feel so awful about leaving P. I didn’t feel terrible about leaving A. She left some time ago, and it was fine. P is different. We casually dated for a while, all the while knowing it wouldn’t go anywhere.
Where first you burn books, next you will burn people!
It might be fun to be the person who comes up with the fun names for make up, or crayons.
M also stands for Marcus Clearspring who created the popular A to Z Navigation Buttons for last year's Challenge. He's done it again. For those of you who are interested in adding the buttons to your site visit Marcus's site Writing Investigated.
¤ Kuding Plus Tea.
12-15-2011
The greatest dilemma of the beat groups was to choose language. Usually they wanted to sing in English, but the record companies often found that the native languages had stronger appeal to the home market.
So, I looked through the baby name book, writing down on a list any names that appealed to me at all. Once I did that, I looked at the categories each were in, and looked through those categories too. Once I did that I had a list of 7-10 girl names and about 5-6 boy names. I ran those by Mike and got some pretty solid vetoes. I suggested Mike do the same and he made up a listing of names. Then I got some vetoes (Herschel? Really?). We settled on a list of 3-4 boy names and about 5-6 girl names. Then we just let the lists marinate for awhile.
She was always so active, involved in numerous sports at State & National level, highly intelligent gaining a “General Excellence Scholarship” (Academic, Sport & Arts) at a private girls school for her senior years, gifted in leadership holding a position her last year of Primary school & two positions (Worshp Captain & Dance Captain) in her final Year 12. She is beautiful inside and out, loving, thoughtful, caring, compassionate, and sensitive.
you won't remember after I bite.
Ridenhour Prize for Truth-Telling — Eileen Foster and Lt. Col Daniel Davis
If you haven't already. Get yourself over to www.cdbaby.com/cd/magicship and treat yourself to a copy of our album. You can download it. We'd be happy if you bought a real CD from them. We get less money, but you get the real deal. We spent a long time working on making a great product, so treat yourself and make the band happy.
I also forgot my laptop this trip so can only post intermittantly on this old desktop here. Nuts.
More info: A Girl in Every Port screens on Tuesday, January 24 at 7 pm as part of "Howard Hawks: The Measure of Man," a retrospective at the Pacific Film Archive in Berkeley. The film will be introduced by UC Berkeley professor Marilyn Fabe; Judith Rosenberg will accompany on piano. Details at http://bampfa.berkeley.edu/film/FN19308
After I got my flying licence and my wind rider, I had a lot of fun just flying all over the place. I loved nothing more than waking up in the morning, hopping on the wind rider, picking a direction and just exploring. I think it looks cute when my little wind rider cub pet follows us. I explored the whole Hellfire Peninsula area – every nook and cranny (well, not the Alliance areas though. They were mean and shot arrows at me, if I got too close. Bullies…). Anyway, you might have guessed, from previous posts, that I’m not a huge fan of the deserty type areas. And that’s really all Hellfire Peninsula is. So I did a little bit of exploring about and found a place called Zangarmarsh.
“Honestly… Honestly I’m saying this. I happen to think Mr Methane’s a genius. I told you I thought he’s funny and I would back him; I certainly would.
"To discuss further what took place 25 years ago, we’re joined by Dr. Janette Sherman. She edited the book Chernobyl: Consequences of the Catastrophe for People and Nature. She’s joining us from Arlington, Virginia, joining us from PBS station WETA.
It had been a nice day, but dark clouds were approaching, but she hadn't noticed yet. She'd had too many sodas and too much cotton candy, and she felt much better than she had for a long time. She'd almost forgotten that business about the uncle and the kiss on the cheek.
and that restaurant was a bit kia su (singaporean) type..
Paisley is rolling from front to back and back to front now. She doesn't just roll all over the house like she could though...and for that I am thankful. I would be thrilled to death if she wanted to be lazy on all fronts of mobility. I didn't have a huge staircase when the other two were learning to crawl, and I am still trying to figure out what to do with mine this go round!
Mila 96
-Get dinner snacks ready
The tea party has a sharply edged message and has used its considerable following to elect public officials, who in turn have affected public policy. For instance, they prevented the GOP leadership from compromising with Obama on raising taxes in exchange for cutting entitlements and government outlays. And the tea party put deficit reduction on the top of the political agenda
6) Liza will be 3 in 1 year and 11 months. If we're going to adopt a baby by the time she's 3, we've got to get some paperwork going stat.
Mrs. Arnold Reeli-Bassackwards(nodding): Negative connotations, you know.
“Most of them are lovely, lovely children. But in cases such as this the law should require more checks to be made to ensure the safety of foster parents.”
Furthermore, the emeritus professor writes bluntly that (capitals by Dittmann) “The Big Die Off has already begun (page 17).”
here are the pictures of our front and back yards as promised....
447100 Gasoline stations (including convenience stores with gas)
If I do ever get that publishing deal I expect it'll be a different story. I'll be begging them to let me give a talk about my 'journey'.
It was a great experience that is fun to talk about with friends that were also there. The ULTIMATE OF SNOW DAYS. And they were happy days :)
The butter oil curds are then melted in large open pots over slow fires. A period of slow boiling will remove any remaining water, by evaporation.
What are your dreams revealing to you? Do you travel to foreign lands, uncovering amazing people and cultures? In your dreams is there acceptance and honor; everyone cooperating with one another? Is there absence of hate, greed and fear? Is the new land wonderful and friendly?
3/19/12 I am thankful for
One of the most difficult parts of being injured for me is feeling lazy. As someone who prides herself in being strong, it is such a challenge to acknowledge the fact that I am not strong right now, and that is not because I am lazy. It’s actually because I injured myself being anything but lazy. Modification is not laziness. When I drop to a lower weight in a strength training class it is not because I am lazy, it is because I have to. When I modify a pose in yoga it is not because I am lazy, it is because I have to. Constantly I have to remind myself that it is not laziness, laziness would be sitting on my couch sulking about my arm. Modifying is necessary for me to continue doing some of the things I love. I’m trying to kick the lazy stigma in the butt (and also punch it with my working left arm). Doing something to the best of your ability is never laziness.
Lisa, starts her story in 1994 when she graduated from college and begins with relating to the emotions that she believes must have been experienced by Lisa ‘Left Eye’ Lopes during the celebrity’s very public breakdown in which she burnt a house down.
2053.E-V/4/1997. “Pardon Everybody.” Chicago Sun-Times, p. 28.
116. One Day in the Life of Ivan Denisovich: Aleksandr Isayevich Solzhenitsyn
3. Food/beer pairings/ beer dinners will continue to grow across the nation.
When the big boss would go through a very complicated, multi-faceted presentation
It's the person - company, really - who knew there would be loads of calorie-conscious women salivating for a way to enjoy their favorite nut butter without the guilt. Women who, apparently, include me.
Remind me to tell you the story of how I wanted to kill that guy in a moment of insanity. And when I say kill I literally mean homicidal-maniac-crazy-lady-murder-in-the-dead-of-the-night-rocking-back-and-forth.
What are your traditions? Write a list and appreciate them in a new way this year. Then ask, “If I could add one new tradition this holiday season, what would it be?” I'd love to hear what you choose! It also makes me smile to think of your children's grandchildren doing the same.
Abolition and anti-slavery, while somewhat interchangeable, were considered two different ideas back then. Anti-slavery activists generally wanted to halt the expansion of slavery into the territories and new states. Abolitionists on the other hand, as the name would suggest, wanted to abolish it completely, across the country. “Immediatists” was a word used often to describe the most “radical” of abolitionists, as they wanted slavery gone at once, rather than have it die off gradually. This was Garrison’s position.
He was director of the super solider program during Vietnam, later sharing the job with Richard Nixon. Kissinger has sent many mind-controlled assassins out to kill hundreds of people.
- Nah, - I said. – What for?
I definately have the strangest pets ever. They all have a tendency to copy each other. It is pretty funny. I have no idea why they do this, but I do know that Boston thinks he is a dog and Patches thinks she is a cat and Americus mostly thinks she is a cat too!
Teak & Sandalwood- white (4 available)
There I stood in the presence of God, uncovered and completely exposed. I had to make a choice.
Pours a light orangish-yellow, with a nice fizzy white head that stays surprisingly well, especially considering how old this beer has to be.
I’ve seen several reviews suggesting that this movie is more seduced by Hollywood than What Price Hollywood? and some other behind-the-scenes films. However, I’m not sure this is fair. There isn’t all that much dwelling on glamour – except for a scene where Vicki is caked with unappealing make-up, including a Joan Crawford mouth. And there are plenty of scenes where the spiteful, backbiting nature of the star machine comes across, for instance in the catty remarks various people make about Norman as soon as he is out of earshot, gloating over his woes – especially the press agent, Matt Libby (Lionel Stander). Someone (Libby?) even makes a cruel joke when Norman has drowned himself, commenting “It’s the first drink of water he’s had in years”. Must admit I find the drowning scene itself hard to take – it somehow seems too smooth and easy, compared to the messiness and horror of Lowell Sherman’s death in What Price Hollywood? – but this sardonic reaction gives back some sharpness, as does the funeral scene, where fans pursue a weeping Vicki demanding autographs.
The final challenge was awesome. They set up a whole gauntlet in the basement and it was like being inside a video game. They took us back 2 at a time. My partner was Bobek. They put him in one room on the other side and me in a room where I was isolated and didn't know what was going on. They gave us one of each weapon and told us we could only use each one once. We could also use any weapon we stole off the guards.
#everyoneknowsatleastonepersonlikethis
I found that marking them made it easier to know where to cut. I also alternated the direction of the crayons and followed a basic rainbow pattern; but it looks awesome when done haphazardly as well :o)
It got away before I could get my phone ready to take a picture so it appears farther away than it really was.
Regrets and mistakes
He initiated the Akshaya Patra program to provide mid-day meals to underprivileged children in the Government schools of Bangalore Rural District during July 2000.
You reached through to a place we’ve both gone, a place I didn’t know you knew as well as I.
Overall: I'm very happy with the way this beer came out. Crisp, clean, bitter, and refreshing. A great beer for Spring. A pilsner of the German persuasion but with Saaz hops. I am a little suprised at the bitterness and I may consider toning it down just a touch in future batches. I was very light handed with the melanoiden malt and I cant really tell what it added to the finished beer, not to say I'd add much more for a delicate beer like this.
California WR Keenan Allen-
My daughter was three and a half months old when she caught her first cold. Old enough to not panic us (after all, she was our second child! We'd been through this before!) and yet new and young enough to completely panic us. (She's so snotty! And unhappy! Hon, do you remember C being this MAD about not being able to breathe through his nose?)
OK, yes, I am aware I have had a son. BUT, and I think many can relate, sometimes you get this surreal realization that you have kids. You're not a teenager anymore. You're out of high school. You've BEEN out for nearly 10 years!! And I have a little guy, that's not so little anymore.
ok, so maybe i didn't.
JNG: You know what, I think I have it pretty good. While most of my friends are in grad school or out there trying to scrape up a job in this economy, I have a great business, a happy life, a great boyfriend, and a house I love. Things are good right now, and I'm grateful. However, if I'm going to be greedy and ask for more, I hope life takes me on to bigger cities and more adventures. As long as I get to be with Travis, have a dog, and like what I'm doing, then the rest is just icing on the cake.
There are thousands of places of worship in the five boroughs of New York City - churches, synagogues, mosques, etc. A small number are major attractions, such as St. Patrick's Cathedral and the Cathedral of St. John the Divine. Others, either architecturally and/or by the nature of an unusual amount of free land surrounding them and manicured grounds, virtually demand the attention of passersby. The Gothic masterpiece Grace Church is a good example (see here as well).
Cameron.
I think that the same logic applies well here, actually. We still co-sleep; in fact, we've been doing it from the get go, more than 12 years now. We choose to continue it because it works for us - for all of us - in many ways. It allows us all a sense of connection at the end of days both good and not so good. It allows us some time to talk before we drift off to sleep. It allows us the sense of security that comes with knowing that we sleep surrounded by love. And it allows us one space in the world which we know is just ours, together, as a family; sometimes the only time we are all together is when we are snuggled in asleep.
I am becoming a bit more primitive with autumn approaching... seems these cooler days bring out the more rustic side of me. I have linked up with some new blog parties this week... looking for my 'niche" If you are new to my blog... Welcome...take a look around my Fine Farmhouse ! I feel I'm a little different from most...I strive to be original, and I truly love this journey of working on this old place...mixing the very old with the new. I have some fun surprises in store in the next couple of weeks... gonna really mix things up a bit !
4) St. Louis, Missouri
On the floor, passed out and blind from seeing all this hotness in one place?
I laid there confused for a few minutes. Is that right? What day is it? Who am I? Where am I? I tend to be a little fuzzy headed in the wee early hours.
– Are Homeowners at Risk if Watch Captain at Fault in Martin Shooting?
Because this fellowship comes into being on the basis of Christ’s unconditional and prevenient invitation, the fellowship will be an open one. It cannot limit Christ’s invitation to its own account. Everyone can participate who wants to participate in the fellowship of Christ. The communion is the answer to Christ’s open invitation…
Are you planning to have an athletic lifestyle or looking for sports adventure? If your answer is yes, then a good planning must be taken into consideration. When it comes to athletic action, comfort is one of the major concerns. Let’s take running for example. If you are planning to run every morning, you have to choose the right shoes for you. This is because if you run with the wrong shoes and with the wrong fitting, you cannot run well, you cannot perform well, and on top of that, your feet can get hurt and get injured. That would be the worst thing that can happen with your feet if you wore the wrong shoes. Another situation is, if you are going to work on your fitness training, and you wear the wrong shoes, you cannot last long because you can get very uncomfortable. This can be really annoying if you are not comfortable with what you wear. So the shoes are very important for athletic lifestyle.
The card is a small square from Craft UK. The lime green card is from Papermill and the tartan paper is from one of Joanna Sheen's early paper pads. I coloured the Whoopsi Daisy freebie image with Promarkers and then cut it with a Spellbinders oval nestability with a lime green scalloped nestie behind. I used one of my 'Australian' satin ribbons down the side and added a red button balloon to the top right. The three red gems at the bottom right corner, plus the balloon button, are from Create and Craft.
46. Grab a fish fry
In January we celebrated the new year at Parkside on 6th Street with my bffs and some of their random friends that I've never met before. :)
i also don't match- but whatever. it is the third to last day of work for awhile so i am not caring very much. at least not enough to prevent putting a picture of me online in non-matching, non-flattering work attire. it's your fault- i just figured i had to give you a visual.
Released: April 1, 2012
The removable bottoms are great for keeping the nest boxes clean, and are actually quite durable. Homemade is great and saves money, but if you have ever had to scoop out some of the stuff that accumulates in nests, you know what I am talking about, broken eggs, chicken crap, add a little heat on a hot summer day, and it’s enough to make you urp right there. This type of nest box would be indispensable too, if you get some kind of pest infestation on your chickens. Pests can hide in every nook and cranny. I can pick up that nest box and carry it outside on my hip, remove the bedding, take out the bottoms and give the entire shebang a deep cleaning. That is impossible to do with a fixed wooden nest box scenario. But, a free ranging chicken lives forever, never craps in the nest or breaks an egg and probably is pest free too, so maybe this last paragraph was a sale’s pitch for free-ranging chickens, I don’t know… .
—The Lotus Eater”
We may not be able to control everything, but we certainly can bring individuals to justice. We can even make the world a better place by how we treat others, even if the world itself keeps sending us earthquakes, floods, hurricanes, tornadoes, volcanoes and droughts. It’s better to go about doing and feeling something than to try to avoid feeling anything. I’ve never really believed in nothing.
A couple shots in rainy LA before I came to China. These boots are pretty intense but everything I could want in a heel boot!
If Shallow Hal has a problem, it is that it often takes the easy way out, either for laughs or tears. The predictable fat jokes are abundant. I expect and thought quite a few were hilarious. The tugging at the heart strings was a bit much. You have to buy into the idea that every fat, unattractive, and crippled person has a heart of gold while anyone who is not like that looks normal. Looking normal in Shallow Hal means being an unsavory type on some level. That is hard to swallow. People are people, with all virtues and flaws intact. The most blatant attempt to choke the audience up is when Hal visits Rosemary as she volunteers at the hospital working with kids. He does not realize--and neither do we--until the hypnotic spell is gone the kids are horribly scarred children in the burn unit. I confess it was a poignant revelation, but they were trying too hard there. Maybe I just do not like being manipulated emotionally.
Beauty is not enough.
Here are some pictures I took on our field trip to the nursery today. I love taking my camera there.....they do so much better with the flowers than we'll ever do and it's just a feast for the eyes!! The colors are amazing and so enjoyable, and so is the aroma! This year I wasn't able to enjoy that, as I'm still all congested with my allergies, but I loved the visual part!!
It’s disgraceful. No wonder our economy is in the toilet. Half our god damned population can barely muster the energy required to repeatedly smack at the snooze button – let alone get their asses out of bed and look for a job.
Here's a short recap of what's been happening with the Test with Skewer family. (Stealing an idea from Hungry Dog - subheadings.)
Update 6 (9:00 PM-11:00 PM):
"Rachel," the fish gurgled. It had a rat like face, gray with whiskers. "Welcome, Rachel."
To WIN my prize all you need to do is comment (all 3 days) below this post and become a if you like my cards become FOLLOWER of my blog
There has been a theme of reality and versions of reality through the current play season. Humor Abuse is a memoir. How to Write a New Book for the Bible has the playwright working from his own diaries. The recent I Am My Own Wife deals with a real individual and the playwright's relationship with her. Yet the question of how much truth makes it to the stage is present in all of them. Rothko is real. The events are real. A lot of the statements about art he makes on stage are real. "Ken" is a composite character, made up of three different unnamed assistants. Is this a biographical piece? Is it accurate? Is it an excuse for an art lecture?
We can also see from the map that, once the area had been logged, the BN YB Daud’s family enterprise started to take advantage of Sarawak’s “plantation phase”, with a very large area handed out to the key PBB politician through the company Eastbourne Properties.
‘As you light his fireworks tonight
With the 1978 release of their album “Van Halen“, the group was launched into Rock Music stardom.
From his back pocket he pulled a roll of notes and handed it to me.
and what cheap wine we could afford
But not before she cries and when her tear lands on the crystals, TURNS INTO A FUCKING MAGICAL CRYSTAL FLOWER
My right time came when I was burnt out and miserable and I doubt I could have done anything else. We made a complete change and luckily for us, it turned out well. I can't help but think about Hanno and I living as we do now but at a much younger age. There would have been different choices made, no doubt, maybe we would have ended up in a different area, but we would have spent much more time outside the mainstream celebrating life and being who we really are. So when is the right time? From experience, I doubt there is one right time. The sooner you can simplify your life, the better you'll be for it.
Presently our chocolates sold through our website at www.chocolateinchelsea.com. We ship, deliver and have pick up in Chelsea. Where to have our chocolates sold has been a big question for us and we are being very, very cautious. We have given it try first with Zingerman's Deli in Ann Arbor, Michigan. We chose them because there commitment to quality is becoming legendary. Their chocolate case is pristine and it has worked out well.
Admitting the black-body radiations of Hawking and Unruh
I could not see many God fearing people in front of this DMV, waiting for a secular public office to open.
Whilst we sat, cupping steamy mugs, we saw, heading into the Loch a pair of Navy ships.
Investigations led police to Katlehong, where they arrested four of the suspects, recovered the car and seized four firearms.
By the way, check Deathspell Omega’s “Veritas Diaboli Manet in Aeternum: Chaining the Katechon”. It’s 22 minutes long, it’s only one track but, artistically-wise, it’s far more dense, solid and intense, than most of the so-called “albums” that are, for the most part, a “collection of tracks recorded during the same session”. Releasing a track each month or twelve a year makes no difference, in my opinion, if the artist is all about “songs” the “usual way”: that’s “just” the “way the band is sounding at a given time”.
Is it worth it? Let's think about it. If my psoriasis did not clear up on it's own and I didn't have the knowledge that I do, I'd be buying expensive tubs of skin cream and I'd be on corticosteroids, at the very least. The steroids may or may not help. Some people have to switch steroids and meds to see what works for them. These medications also have side-effects such as
08-15 Ghent, Belgium - St. Peter's Square
JohnMark Triplett’s
That drape has been down for probably two years now. The drapery hardware has not. ;)
It was awesome! Adrenaline rush was pumping all throughout the show. Since I like clothes, It was so cool to be surrounded withKermit (not the frog. Tesoro), Joey Samason, Zara (but just the clothes), Marc Jacobs (also just his clothes), Sassa Jimenez (she was so sweet and easy to work with) and others designers. It was not just their clothes present in the room, we are actually inside one room, breathing the same air. (OA!)
I would suspect that was the time God started to slowly reveal to the king that he, himself couldn’t make his ‘new queen’ (Esther) submit without changing his own heart. Preparing and directing them both to be helpmates, God’s original and most successful plan for husbands and wives.
One of the (many) things that has gotten me down is the fact that I haven't kept up with blogging at all. It's something that I really enjoy doing and I have no idea why I put it off. Sometimes I pressure myself too much about things until I no longer care to do them at all. Do any of you ever do this?
Although this doesn't sound exactly like the dream felt- it wasn't as threatening as it sounds. And the mermaids weren't really evil, more so just territorial. They were just a part of that world and were conscious of us just like we were conscious of them.
'What's the connection between Homer Simpson and Larbert, and why are generations of lawyers grateful to a Paisley snail? Need to know more? Author Edwin Moore has gathered 1000 facts like these about Scotland in a quirky new book. Brian Swanson selects a few favourites. . .' - Scottish Daily Express, 13 September 2008
with some fabric, laces, flowers and my FAVORITE : Longing Tilda!
Little did they know, machines would not be used to move Earth today.
OK maybe now I can get back on track with my chakra meditation, let it go and let it be.
with your hands, roll out each ball into a length which measures about 8 1/2 to 9 inches. you will notice that it may crack while you're rolling it out. don't worry about that, just squeeze it together and work it so it extends. the cracks are part of the look of the cookie.
Last night I am talking to S1 and asked if FDIL got it all straightned out with her mom and he said no. Well, I continued to tell him that it is THEIR wedding, neither stunning mom nor HAWT dad are paying a dime towards any of it so S1 and FDIL had every right to determine who gets an invite and who doesn't. Just my opinion. I wasn't telling them what to do, just answering their question.
Alright, here are the facts about the outfits from left to right:
I must let go.
I choose to let go of anything that does not support my goal and my Christian life, to God’s glory in Christ Jesus! Amen!
All of the truth was those eyes, and the poison gland that was next to them.
This time around, though, it's the real thing. Cherish the Light Years is, apparently, the record frontman Wesley Eisold always wanted to make. And, boy, does that shine through.
Well i'm here to share with you my latest bit of SMASH*ing... I have to say I am rather impressed with these pages, in my litre world A is not for..
When we dig up radioactive materials and put them in our environment, they will still create “death” AS THEY ARE DESIGNED TO DO. We do need these metals… we just need to put them back in the ground and leave them here so that they can do their job.
oplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeoplepeople
What we frequently fail to tell people, while we are telling them to ‘give their hearts to Jesus,’ is that God has made demands not just on our heart, but on our very lives as represented here by the apostle in these words: “…offer your bodies…” Now this is representative, but it is far more than metaphor. No, I happen to think that the apostle is not mincing words at all. Offer your bodies is Paul’s way of saying: Your entire being now belongs to God in light of His mercy.
That makes perfect sense! Malaysian regulations are known to be very, very specifically worded, so of course Astro was forced to specifically cut out the part where a rally-goer was talking about how the police shot at civilians.
but adulthood happens just the same. The older I get
For that gift, Mr. D'Aquila, many of your former students owe you a lifetime of thank-you cards.
I have a new camera - I am so stoked! My camera was only 3 years old but it started to give me trouble this spring when trying to photograph birds. Only self control (and being cheap) stopped me from throwing it into the ponds a few times on the weekend. Out of the blue this morning hubby announces that we are going to Windsor today and he was buying me a new camera. WHAT? No, not possible. Hubby does not like to spend money and he has zero interest in taking pictures himself. Hmmm, I must have shown my frustration a little more then I thought!
On the needles is yet another gift, a scarf to go with the hat I made Emma but haven't yet revealed. This pattern is in my head and I'm hoping it goes well with the hat which is a simple rib and stocking stitch beret.
Today I have a quick little tutorial to share with you. I've been mildly obsessed with using every last drop of the new Market Fresh Kits from MSS... lol! And today I have another little trick to share with you. It's something that I thought of AFTER I made a layout for the last kit release. I made a tiled paper accent on one of my layouts and LOVED the effect, but it was way more work than I wanted to do again... and then I started to think about it. And realized that I was kinda silly to cut all those squares and glue em back down... haha! I thought up an easier way and I thought I'd share it with you!
The Government of the Confederate States has hitherto forborne from any hostile demonstration against Fort Sumter, in the hope that the Government of the United States, with a view to the amicable adjustment of all questions between the two Governments, and to avert the calamities of war, would voluntarily evacuate it. There was reason at one time to believe that such would be the course pursued by the Government of the United States; and under that impression my government has refrained from making any demand for the surrender of the fort. But the Confederate States can no longer delay assuming actual possession of a fortification commanding the entrance of one of their harbors, and necessary to its defense and security.
He considers his latest film “Ides of March”, in which he co-stars, co-wrote and directs, as a “morality piece”, about being “willing to trade to succeed” and though set during a presidential primary, “not about politics, a thriller”. When he first wanted to make the film in 2007, “everyone was so hopeful” about Barack Obama, it was a “bad time” for the cynical subject to attract an audience. He said “It took about a year with the health care debate…Bad news for the country, but got the movie made.”
But there's nothing really there.
This post on the great site How Does She? got me motivated. I typed up my boys morning schedules (baby steps here) and we're starting that tomorrow. Then, I'll add the afternoon/evening schedules. I don't want to be too scheduled, I like my kids having free time-time to think, draw, play, be bored...the same reason I don't overschedule my kids. They get one extracurricular activity. Cooper is doing basketball and then, perhaps karate. Spencer starts water polo in 2 weeks and has only been doing the afterschool class of rockets and drama at school. I listened to a friend the other day rattle off her daughters' schedules: ballet, girl scouts (she leads 2 groups, too!), cheerleading, piano...and the girls are only 8 and 5. Whew. I got hives thinking about that. I know some parents love that, but not me. Having dinner as a family is more important to me. I'm also going to try the chores list again-I've tried quite a few, but found one here that I think will work:raisingahealthyfamily.com.
1255 **D-IX/11/1996. “Magna Carta and Self-Help.” The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. (Incorporated in Item C-1996(5), above, pp. 286-91.)
“Then what’s the point of bathing,” he grumbled.
It sounds like you'd like to make a payment. Is that correct?
A couple of these tracks were recorded with my old roommate Devin Carlen in a late night, wasted recording session. I gave them a listen recently, and a few had a very freaky experimental edge that I still found entertaining six years later. Just as a warning, if you listen to "Waiting in a Time Capsule Trapped in Outer Space" on headphones, it may actually drive you insane - that or make you vomit from disorientation. Either way - you have been warned.
They've hurt you. You are broken.
See? B*tsh*t Crazy Lady.
In my search I stumbled across La Femme blushes. The brand was completely new to me, but the price was so low and based on the reviews I found, the quality seemed too good to pass up. Make Up Mania seems to be the best source for La Femme blushes, and is where I purchased mine from. They have a huge selection of colours and at $2.50 each you can totally splurge and get a ton at a time.
I'll share that as I blew out the candle on my piece of key lime pie for dessert I closed my eyes and made a wish. I've already learned that wishes do come true and I hope each of us can get more than one prayer answered. Anyway, time will tell how this one turns out..... :)
independent research and consultative institution (SIS). And if it is dealing with charities (especially charitable trusts, such as
When it comes to grilling kebabs, Mr.4444 recommends using two skewers for each one--It keeps the food from spinning around the sticks and allows for more even cooking that way. (I'll keep that in mind for next time.)
a heart to break.
My first Memorial Day I was not willing to admit that it had anything to do with Chris. We had always gone and placed flags at grave sites on this day. My first Memorial Day I did the same thing with Oliver and Owen in tow. But on that first one, there were more deaths. A CPT Alex Funkhouser was killed while in the line of duty not only to his country but to US reporters in Iraq. I knew that all that I had been feeling since January 5, his wife would now feel too. My heart broke for I knew every Memorial Day she would have a double heart wrenching reminder of her husband's death. I knew that she would face Memorial Day and the 29th of May, double days for her. Little did I know that this wife, now a new widow like me would become one of my best friends. Little did I know that she had two girls close to my two boy's age. Little did I know that our lives ran in such a parallel manner.
Marshmallow Peeps Martini
Sam trades Monkeypus for a Real Live Girl (we assume an embryo in a box), which, after talking to his friend, the Blueberry Pirate (Joshua Taylor), he decides to take to Jupiter for more trading. Jupiter, by the way, is now a mining colony run by Lee Vilensky (Peter McRobbie channeling Robert McNamera), who rewards his workers with shows from The Boy Who Actually Saw a Women’s Breast (Gregory Russell Cook, who “gets to” wear a great costume: “It was round and soft”). Sam convinces Vilensky to trade him The Boy for the Real Live Girl. He succeeds and jets off, intending to trade The Boy on Venus for the recently deceased King. Since only women inhabit Venus, they keep a stud male around to keep the gene pool from stagnating. The former stud has died and his wealthy family on Earth is willing to pay handsomely for the return of his body. Sam and The Boy get held up along the way to Venus, however, when they run into a flying barn in space. After a quick discussion with the barn’s inhabitants (silver miners from Nevada who accidentally gained super intelligence), Sam agrees to take a boy (who wears a bodysuit and is ignorant) back to Earth with him in exchange for chocolate and cigarettes.
The photos were carefully laid over each-other using a computer program to create an individual image for each area - and the biggest surprise is that the 'common' faces are all quite beautiful.
myself…
I loved the beautiful musical program at church on Christmas Day.
He added that his ministry’s views have been shaped after considering the Justice Jeevan Reddy report and all other reports.
Roman Holiday
In pondering all this, I was reminded of the rather delightful – and telling - Buddhist story on the same topic.
It's so much fun to experience things as if you are for the first time with a baby, because she is! Babies are so much fun, even if it is tiring at times!
Finally, I told him I had nothing more to say and I left and went to a little local restaurant (the same place we’re going for lunch) and had a couple of tacos.
1) Except for a Memorial Day Weekend blogging hiatus, keep all my writing routines -- Daily Writing Chain (aka Seinfeld Chain), blogging schedule, etc. - Well, no interruptions so far.
As you may know, my current obsession revolves around two amazing Russian urban paranormal films, based on a series of books by Sergei Lukyanenko. I've recently finished the first book and I'm in the middle of the second book right now.
4. Explosion of the ‘celebrity status’ writer, perpetrated by commercial publishers trying to find the winning marketable book every time.
Amps were cranked to 11 and minds were blown at the Fox Theater early last week as French electro house heroes Justice hit Oakland for a much-anticipated performance. Each year around mid-April, the Bay Area plays host to a high concentration of top tier artists because of the infamous Coachella festival in Southern California. The festival always boasts an impressive lineup and many of them end up booking dates in San Francisco before or after the festival. Since Coachella was expanded to two separate weekends this year, there were even more opportunities for great talent like Justice to come up north and play during this “Fauxchella” week. It’s a winning situation for Northern California, and Justice definitely lived up to the hype to deliver an adrenaline-infused set that people and their ringing ears will be high from for days to come.
The Kernel and Brew Wharf Collaboration Brew 4.5%
I got my gym bag out of the back seat. What to do with the remains of the doughnuts? I had already decided that they weren't very good, but I also knew that not being very good would not be enough to stop me from eating the rest of them when I got done swimming.
:: Don't worry, you will be getting a day in the life post this week, just not until Friday. Don't you think you can hold out? I hope so. A mama I'd really like to meet someday will be joining us :o).
branden
My favourite ramen in Singapore can be found at Ippudo, Mandarin Gallery. To be precise, my favourite is the Akamaru Shinaji. According to the menu:
Malts: Maris Otter Pale Ale, Roasted Barley, Black, Crystal 120, Crystal 45
Pour the oil in a baking dish and tilt to coat bottom. Add sausage and toss well to coat. Bake in hot oven 10 min.
Total of 20,400 added unemployed
Fact is: all this green is very much needed. More so: the green can make it perfectly without us, but it just won’t work the other way. Some people seem to be more aware of that than others.
But I do think it’s somewhat ridiculous to have these types of shows; how the hell do those characters accomplish anything in a given day? Everybody is always in the hospital or dealing with some sort of affair that I’m not sure how they pay the bills every month.
If you mention my giveaway on our blog/sidebar another entry.
Have you ever looked over a pools rim,
THE Enfield Nine returned to work this week after two weeks of intense strike action.
Real gangs possess a sort of physical strength and presence that me and my ‘friends’ simply don’t have. The answer: Get tough. We’re going to start going to the gym, and bench pressing scantily clad women and exercise bikes with a previously dictated selection of our ten fingers. I said this because that’s pretty much the only things I’ve found at my local gym that are heavy enough to lift and look tough doing. We’ve already organised. Me and me mates are going to do boxing, running on the beach, stretches and shiz and cage fighting juvenile bears. Also taekwondo. By the end we should be so damn awesome we’d be able to take on any of the other measly gangs and groups that operate in our little town with contemptuous ease. We’ll also be able to take on the Lads, depending how many of them there are. I hear they hang outside shopping malls searching for brand name clothing and funny looking people to abuse. We’ll put a stop to that. But being tough and whatnot is only a small part of being a gang. The other part is collectivism. Yay! Collectivism!
As soon as the syrup reaches the proper temperature, pour in the peaches and any other juice that has accumulated. Cook over high heat, stirring as needed, until the peaches begin to get translucent. This took me about another half hour or so.
Page 4: Anchor Steam Christmas Ale. $10.99 for a 6 pack.
Your 3 goddesses that would like to work with you at this time are Kali, Abundantia and Sige. Each brings a message that should guide you at this time. It is important for you to take quiet time and contemplate what is happening or bothering you at this time. Ensure that you are keeping your regular meditation practice as this brings you much grounding and clarity at this time of transformation. Be sure that you complete and release people, situations and relationships that don’t serve you at this time. Be honest with yourself and trust your hearts desire to manifest in your life. Keep focused and keep moving. There is an abundant supply of all things available to you and everyone and remember that there is enough for everyone. You have been going through some big challenges and once this time has been mastered you will indeed know how truly powerful you are.
All just observations and thoughts I wanted to write out, for my own benefit down the line, as well as for whomever else it might concern. Hunger isn’t always a bad thing. Like every other feeling that’s uncomfortable, it just might teach you something if you let it.
Naia Kete, Turning Tables – Blake suggested that Naia sing this song true to the original instead of giving it a reggae vibe, and I agreed with that suggestion. It’s a great song as it is, and I think she sang it very well. Christina didn’t like it at all, and she didn’t try to hide that much either. I think her comments went beyond “constructive” and were just rude.
So that’s done! I sent their money by PayPal and hope they fix it on eBay…and if they don’t…we’ll just fix it another way.
Congratulations! Please email me at imakethegrade (at) gmail (dot) com with your mailing address so that the prizes may be mailed to you. You have 72 hours to respond before I select a new winner.
Mary Magdalene was not considered an actual disciple, but appears as if she was the most beloved of Jesus. Reading about the Jesus family tomb supports the rumors that Jesus and Mary Magdalene were married. When they married is difficult to concern. It may have been in the two year that they traveled together. It may have been after his resurrection—assuming he didn’t actually physically die. Perhaps Jesus just went into hiding and moved to France with Mary and his family!
This pack is filled with about 80 pages of before, during and after reading activities, writing scaffolds and graphic organisers/organizers. Just leave a comment and when I get home from seeing The Hunger Games tomorrow morning I'll draw a winner. Time for bed I think, it's almost midnight here...
Gorny's book lays to rest the myth that the Jewish press in the Land of Israel ignored the victims of the Holocaust or that the yishuv's inhabitants and its leading personalities were indifferent to the fate of European Jewry. According to Porat,
And there are enough pieces left over to make another 3 or 4!
Then there comes that day of mixed emotions. In 2009 I retired, after nearly seventeen years of headship in three schools. Hard work, yes, but along the way I had worked with some very talented teachers, dedicated support staff and delightful children. These pictures were taken at the Leavers’ Assembly and I can’t show any pupil faces, except in the lovely book they made for me. Of course, they’re hanging on my word, as you can see.
My life is consumed with doing things in excess. Right now I should probably be working on a stack of journals for my English class, or studying chemistry, or working on an English project, but I’d rather sit on social networking sites like Facebook, Twitter, and Tumblr. I also feel like writing an essay is not the best use of my time either, but who is really out there judging me. I say “excess” because it is a very true statement of how I live my life. Too much internet time when I should be working on homework. Too much time spent watching the Food Network–we all know that I watch out of a sick enjoyment, and I do not plan on actually preparing any meals. Too many fashion magazines sprawling out on my bathroom floor. I live my life in excess.
“Lord Jesus, put within my heart a burning desire to be changed and transformed in your holiness. Let your Holy Spirit change my heart and renew me in your love and righteousness.
Flying Dog Gonzo Imperial Porter 7.5%
They have attacked one of the most fundamental of all Freedoms, the right of free speech!Unite behind Obama? Never!
Next I pulled out all those little fused scraps of this and that. All saved from earlier projects because they were too valuable to throw out! So here is what I have so far. It's fun, but perhaps a monstrosity! We'll see. Mostly it is a learning and confidence building exercise.
He continues its equivocation.
We're at the tenth installment in the Alone & Forsaken mixtape series, which either means I'm an industrious little fella, or that my life hasn't taken a noticeable turn for the better, can't decide which. Hoohaw, whatever, here ya go.
5:20am-The particular song ends(explicit version of love the way you lie Eminem ft. if i remember correctly!).No sound from the other side.
A few weeks ago I got an opportunity to direct a short film for my church’s, C3 Church Manhattan, Easter Sessions. The Easter Sessions was a series that covered seven things Jesus said on the Cross along with seven artistic showcases to compliment each message. And I chose “Why have You forsaken me?” I really wanted to go into why I chose it, but my reasons behind this are really long (it’s best saved for conversations over coffee, hot chocolate or wine). What it boils down to is that I chose that theme because it spoke to me and I wanted to tell that story. My favourite thing about this film is that of all the films I’ve done, this is the one that I can’t explain. To be more exact, I can’t explain why people connected to it the way they did. I know how much work was put into it by everyone who was a part of it. I know each character’s backstory. But I can’t tell you why so many people have connected with it. Telling a story is like planting a seed. You care for it and nurture it as best as you can, but at some point you just have to sit back and watch it grow. It’s great to get a glimpse of how a story can be bigger than you.
So this was the conversation that he shared with me on Monday.
Still, it's been fun. I wrote a piece for Anne Wareham's website, Thinkingardens, about the forum I attended on Monday at the invitation of the Royal Horticultural Society. This was reviewing the rules concerning the judging of show gardens, and it was fascinating.
WHEN: I created this last year. 2010. THE year for graphic action art. No, not really. But (I did it, again!) it was my year for it ( I did two others in a series) and I will do it this year, too!
Just my luck it won't work. Just like with my luck the work laptop has decided to start playing up last weekend. Turns out it's the explorer process which hangs, but oh so annoying when you have to restart it several times in order to get all your programs to run properly.
No, I did read the article. I believe he should be tried and convicted and sent to prison. I do not feel the same inclination as you to fantasize about him being gang raped, strung up by his balls, tortured, killed slowly, had things rammed up his ass etc etc....I think the crime was horrible, and truly tragic and sad, and that is what I feel - sad. The world is an ugly place, and people do ugly things, and I don't think doing more ugly things stops ugly things from happening.
I remained silent about my own sexuality but I began to study the Old Testament by myself, the Jewish Tanach, what the Scripture says about the “catalogue of sins”. I soon suspected that my Christian “brothers” and “sisters” were not so familiar with what the Bible says about “homosexuality” and everything else that speaks of sin and abomination.
“We are very excited to be bringing audited web traffic, e-newsletter and circulation information to the marketplace in a single, consolidated statement,” said Melissa Summerfield, senior group publisher, Oral Health Group. “I believe our clients will appreciate seeing the potential to reach the dental profession and marketplace via multiple channels with fully audited statistics.”
Well, for Gwyneth, Jennifer, Zoe, and Nikki, literally, but many other celebrities are jumping on the “go green” bandwagon!
But the biggest shock of all is that he wants to Privatise the public libraries!!
Interesting, but maybe scary, Pick:
We are beautiful, and beauty never dies
Bill and I had just one interaction, repeated many times. I would greet Bill with a standard ‘how’s it going?’ and he would shoot me a toothy grin and say, ”I struggle. How about you?”
Consolidated You suck US
January, the second of February, right through to the second of
Sometimes I think Louie just wants Mike to learn the old fashioned way.. trial and error..
I have some friends on Facebook that come from Malaysia, and since I regularly post this on Facebook, I wonder if any of them read my blog. I’ve also briefly mentioned Malaysia in several posts, but mostly these are captions on photos. I really miss Malaysian curry, roti, eating at Mary Brown outlets in Malaysia, and eating at Mamak Stalls!
The tip of his cock slid down my skin and over my pussy and then he pushed himself deep inside me with hard deliberate force.
My dad, who was demobbed in the UK after the war and stayed as a refugee, finally managed to get in touch with some of his family through the Red Cross. This was years later, after he had met and married my mother, and quite a long time after I was born. His mother died not long after this, but he stayed in touch with the Kossak side of the family.
Paul’s gospel did not come by a man or an angel but by a revelation from Jesus.
He cited the case of Tan Sri Rahim Noor as an example, where the former Inspector-General of Police had resigned to take responsibility for giving Datuk Seri Anwar Ibrahim a black eye when the latter was in prison.
Kathy, on the other hand, was a person who functioned entirely by depending on careful analysis and preparation. Once she had mastered a topic, she planned her classes practically to the minute. As I walked by her classroom, I would hear her voice, look at my watch, and joke quietly to other teachers, “It’s 11:15 am. I now exactly what she is going to say right now, because it’s on her schedule.”
Conditions can make you dry
That's how close they are to us.
He is just right. The more I get to see of him, the better he looks. He’s not too skinny, not too bulky. The only thing he has is a little tummy, but even that is firming up now.
The kingdom that suffered in the economic sector as well as in the job market, is hoping to regain the lost glory. The real estate market was one of the most affected during the year-long protests by the kingdom’s majority Shia section. Some of the key areas, including capital Manama, is among the badly hit. Flat and commercial rents were slashed 50 percent: Landlords were forced to reduce the rents to avoid further losses on the buildings and the car parks, on which they were already paying taxes.
A is back to all her groups/classes this week: drama, guides, piano. Piano is a bit of a bone of contention at the moment. She's not really enjoying learning, and sees it as Mum 'making her' do something. Its a difficult one - on one hand I can see her point of view, why should she be made to do classes she's not interested in? But on the other - she does enjoy music very much and has a real ear for it, it would be a real shame to waste that talent. I would never push her to do exams or anything like that, but reading and playing music to a competent level would be a great skill for her to have, useful in so many ways and situations. I think I may have to agree to stop the lessons, for now anyway, I'm hoping that at some point she will realise how learning music could benefit her.
I should pause here a minute to explain what exactly a sunchoke is, since they are not very common American cuisine. The sunchoke (also called sunroot, or most commonly Jerusalem artichoke) is a native North American member of the same plant family as sunflowers, that produces a large potato like tuber that resembles a ginger root in size, shape, and color. The tubers can be eaten raw or cooked any way a potato can and taste much like potatoes.
Phusion Projects, the manufacturer of the popular but controversial caffeinated alcohol drink Four Loko, said late Tuesday it will remove the caffeine from its products, pulling the blend off the market just as the Food and Drug Administration was poised to ban it and other such caffeinated malt beverages.
There are so many different things you can do with this theme! (Green, rainbows, shamrocks...luck...just to name a few!!). Here are some gorgeous samples from our DT to help get your St. Patty's Day mojo flowing:
Stamps: Magnolia Tilda (This was an image sent to me by a very special blogging friend. Thanks Hun!)
“Spend less time chasing the Guru(s), and more time doing what he/she/they say”
By: Angela Masciulli, CP (Guest Blogger)
2012 is already shaping up to be a fantastic and extremely unpredictable season. I had no idea what to expect, going into today’s race and it really was anybody’s game. Mercedes had a fantastic qualifying session on Saturday, with Nico Rosberg finally getting his first pole. Michael Schumacher qualified a respectable 3rd, but started on the front row in 2nd, after Lewis Hamilton received a 5 grid spot penalty, for a gear box change.
However, though even the Government are not keen to be associated with the embarrassing fools who constitute the "Taxpayers Alliance" there must be a risk that they will follow the lead to attack trade unions.
that what I'd planned-
Mrs Marr picks up the black cat who has greeted her at her open front door. “You should pop in some day Greenie. It’s been ages since you came in for a cuppa. I know you're busy though, I can't help noticing all those people that come and go out of your front door. Not as many lately though!"
I love bakeries, and baked items, just all things pastry. During my college years, there was a particular bakery in our hometown of Kottayam (located in the Southern Indian state of Kerala) which was my favorite happy place. It carries a certain nostalgic era for me of days gone by- the smells, and endless varieties of tasty delights behind shiny glass counters. From an array of sweetmeats to fantastic finger foods, this local joint had it all! It was the fun hangout where you'd meet up friends, chomp on majorly yum eats and sweets, maybe sip a "Sip Up" or two. Good memories all revolving around the good bakehouse.
About Baby Magic
While the busy world nods indulgently, I do just as I please quite really. I get away with it most oftenly, chuckling to myself quite innardly.
P.S. In a fit of teenage rebellion, my creativity has taken my money and run like Abigail in The Crucible. Which means…I need ideas for blog posts! Feel free to comment with any book related (or nerd/geek related) topic you want to hear my thoughts on. My creativity did leave me with a few things, but I have a sneaking suspicion they’re all the old, boring topics no one wants to hear about.
"The term feminism can be used to describe a political, cultural, or economic movement aimed at establishing equal rights and legal protection for women."The "second wave" began in the early 1960s and lasted through the late 1980s. Some scholars say the second wave continues to exist alongside the "third wave" of feminism, which has already begun. I was called a Women's Libber during the "second wave" because I dared to speak up about sexism and the fact that women made less than men for doing the same work and could be told with impunity, "We don't hire women to do that." It didn't matter if women could do the job, maybe even better than the man hired. We were told, "Men have to support their families."
Only a writer would have this sort of dilemma.
So, when the sun comes out, enjoy (don’t get burnt), and think of me. Knitting sweaters.
Big Oil loves neocons. And the CURRENT VERSION of America’s Supreme Court has “greased the financial contributions skids” so that BIG OIL can now show its appreciation for what the neocons have done.
Place the basil and garlic in the work bowl of a food processor. Process, scraping down the sides of the bowl as needed, until finely chopped. Add flour and salt; pulse to combine.
The concept made me want the book focused on the human Laurette and not Evalle. It was almost as if it was Laurette’s story as seen by Evalle. The twist kept me reading and enjoying the book.
Some novels take a long time to gestate and this is true of First the Torch by Richard Baker ($22.00, http://www.junglesnaps.com/). Well before the U.S. got involved in Vietnam, it was the French colonial forces that were facing the Viet Minh. The story, however, begins far from Vietnam in South Dakota where Bix is a young man who wants some adventure before he settles on the family farm. He meets French-educated Chau, a Vietnamese girl who has been victimized by the racism that could be found in early 1950s American culture. They become friends and Bix decides he should join the French Foreign Legion to help save Chau’s homeland from the communists. His best friend, Steve, joins him and both end up in Dien Bien Phu. Meanwhile Chau has changed side and joined the Viet Minh. The two friends discover how quickly life can change. The author served in Viet Nam where he was twice wounded. On his return home he held many jobs and earned a master’s degree in fiction writing, earning the Ernest Hemingway Award. He currently works as an editor of Vietnam Cultural Window in Hanoi. This is a “big novel” for the themes it tackles and the story it tells. The French lost the six month siege of Dien Bien Phu. The U.S. stepped in and, as they say, the rest is history.
Racked: 08-08-2008
After Cheri’s fascination with Alex Jay dwindled, she set her sights on Greg Harris Honeycutt. Greg was a handsome young man who all the girls chased. He was tall and muscular, played on the football and the baseball team. He had his choice of any of the girls in school. Most of the time Cheri would simply invite her, latest conquest, to her apartment. Most of the boys in her class had been in her apartment, and in her. All of them, that is, except for Greg Honeycutt. From the head of Loathsome Creek, he didn’t come to town much. The only time he was in Poverty was for school activities and ball games. Cheri knew that her plan for seducing Greg would have to take place while school was in session.
Get yourself out there and talk to as many people as you can whilst you’re here in Birmingham. This could mean something as small as staying an extra five minutes to talk to your course-mates and colleagues about what they’re working on at the moment career-wise, or if they know anywhere/anyone that could help you.
I started my second All I Need is a TARDIS (Knit Picks Felici in the Time Traveler colorway) sock. It's great movie/tv/car knitting, as it's just around and around until I close the toe (and of course I'll need to add the waste yarn for the afterthought heel). I tried to get the stripes to match, but I believe it's 2 rows off. Oh well, that stuff doesn't bother me. :)
Water balloons were the ultimate weapon.
3. Smile Time 5.14 (8/6)
Really intense deep marmalade colour.
Enter to win using the handy Google doc below. I love to hear from my readers in the comments as well.
Y’all be blessed and I’ll be back after Chicago to tell you all about it.
Fotos by Will Van Dorp.
“As a career plan, I want to design planes.”
I'm tired, y'all!
I had a real decent sized glass and this tasting was over with in no time. I had to stop myself from going back and getting a second glass.
My passions from a common spring —
will travel there, via rocket or
Along with other British National Party supporters I have been receiving my share of midnight calls. However this afternoon, obviously fired up on white lightening to give himself some courage, one decided to call during the day.
My best friend and I rented A Nightmare on Elm Street in the middle of winter, sitting down on the floor in my spare room (where we liked watching movies the best, because there was a big full sized bed to lounge on), and watching this old movie. And loving every minute of it.
9. Mazzy Star - Fade Into You
While Ashbery fantasizes paradisiacal scenes that reaffirm the imagination, Bernstein hallucinates in a series of associations that disintegrate into a mere listing (“Lobsters, oysters, / clams, crabs, tuna fisheries, shrimps,” p. 6), and immediately relapses into the surrounding technological structures:
Cheers’
The produce of the tongue, be it life or
Apollo and his many steeds
He PROUDLY walks out with his daddy and jumps in the truck!!! after quite a while they return and Siah is WALKING EVER SO TALL and says "MOM, THATS IT NOW, IM A REAL DINUBA WRESTLER!!! I'M A WRESTLER JUST LIKE MY DADDY AND MY NINO!!! and mom I can do this so dont freak out okay, im a tough kid and I'm a Douglas PLUS MOM REMEMBER, "I CAN DO ALL THINGS THROUGH JESUS CHRIST WHO GIVES ME STRENGTH"
Western Man can see the latest CGI effects in high resolution but refuses to see (acknowledge) the increasing number of Orcs rampaging through his streets.
beautiful things..You will want to check out her blog for more inspiration!
Sit with me a minute. Pull up your chair, turn down your music. It's been so long since we've talked. I've needed these 2 months and 13 days of silence to live with the last 9 months and 6 days I have lived without my mother and with the 32 years we lived together.
While courtly love, this ideal of romance, was at its peak, women like Christine began to expose “the attitudes it promoted toward women, and its reduction of romance to sexual conquest—and abandonment” (Kelly 10). Women were nothing more than sexual objects made to feel empowered for the purposes of the game but ultimately losing.
Cline was in control of her own career, making it clear that she could stand up to any man—verbally and professionally—and challenge their rules if they got in the way of where she felt her career should be headed. In a time when concert promoters often cheated stars out of their money by promising to pay them after the show but running with the money during the concert, Cline stood up to many of the male promoters before she took the stage and demanded their money by proclaiming: “No dough, no show.” According to friend Roy Drusky in the 1986 documentary The Real Patsy Cline: “Before one concert, we hadn’t been paid. And we were talking about who was going to tell the audience that we couldn’t perform without pay. Patsy said, ‘I’ll tell ‘em!’ And she did!” Friend Dottie West stated, “It was common knowledge around town that you didn’t mess with ‘The Cline!’”
Just above this sign was the face of a human
Disc 2 - WDR Radio Live 1969 (56:58)
Me: Name a country that starts with the letter D.
The citadel- forgive me but I don’t remember any names of the cities because I keep calling them the names from heroes 3- the one that used to be tower, is a strong city with cool heroes and a well functioning army. It is a bit hard to use because I have very little patience with the gargoyles and the golems, but it works.
It has led to officers running the ground-breaking counter-terrorism programme Channel to redraft guidance to take into account the growing threat.
On the reverse cone end the residual bliss of consciousness is the rising purity of the new wave
Also I'm huge! I am 30.5in and 22.5lbs!
this heartache
I had been noticing something that has been bothering me before seeing this interview… and it is almost ALWAYS a sign that deception is afoot. That is those crocodile tears. There is a sniff and a kinda wipe to the cheek, but not one speck of moisture emitting from those eyeballs. No redness to the face, no puffy eyes. No emotion. At least not the kind of emotion that i think any mother who truly does not know where, what & who has their child!
The French Revolution
From the beginning the character “Haruhi Suzumiya” was always a high tempo characters. Thus I had to make a low tempo character, “Yuki Nagato”, in comparison but really… you get that feeling from everyone else, don’t you?
As the blurb tells us, young Clete Benteen (14 years old) is forced into manhood to support his widowed mother and fellow siblings, as well as avenge his father’s murder. This brings him into contact with his father’s employer, a powerful rancher by the name and style of Judge Terril, and a group of sinister, hired guns that Terril employs to enforce his power.
Y'all know I'm not afraid of color...but I must say as I was walking through my house, I was noticing that my actual furniture pieces aren't colorful...AT ALL.
I have gained a lot through the reading of those five books. This has set something off inside of me. I now have the desire to where I want to read all of the Holy Bible. I have also read the Book of Revelation and the Gospel of John sometime during these four weeks.
5. Retrieve pill from goldfish bowl and cat from top of wardrobe. Call spouse from garden.
It strikes me that Trella is one of the more realistic characters I’ve run into. She makes mistakes and then seeks to remedy them. Some days, I feel like that’s all I do. She’s strong and brave, but sometimes she really just wants to get away and explore. Perhaps my favorite part about Trella is how it takes her a little while to come around to things. She had brilliant plans that fabricate instantly, but when it comes to the really big things in her life, she’s a little slow on the uptake and that’s the most human trait Snyder could have built into her. It makes it so much easier to empathize with her.
4And when the seven thunders had uttered their voices, I was about to write: and I heard a voice from heaven saying unto me, Seal up those things which the seven thunders uttered, and write them not.
Marketers know that success comes from a complex formula, and Jeff’s strategy includes many moving parts. Harvard Book Store pays fanatical attention to customer service with an unrivaled staff of passionate and educated booksellers. They have spent years building a local brand. They bring people together with over 300 public events a year. They’re exceptional retailers with a frequent buyer program. They understand technology, and you can expect them to continually adapt.
So generally speaking, all garments sold as sleepwear, or would be interpreted as sleepwear, need a garment assessment.
This cake design was inspired by the bridal shower invitation. Cake is iced in cream with a piped scroll design. Green fondant ribbon draped over cake with a purple and cream plaque with K + T for the couple. This is a large 12 inch round cake, appoximately 45 servings.
rubber stamps
“Well okay, I’ll try it. If you say.”
Surviving Your Doctors: Why the Medical System is Dangerous to Your Health and How to Get Through it Alive by Dr. Richard S. Klein, M.D., ($32.95, Rowman & Littlefield) points out that, “every year, at least 100,000 patients die in American hospitals because of malpractice.” Drawing on 38 years of experience in the healthcare industry and 20 years testifying in malpractice lawsuits, the author has a lot to say about things you should do to protect your health and deal with what he calls the “organized crime” of insurance providers and plans. When dealing with your physician, keep in mind he has allotted you about 15 minutes time for the visit, so Dr. Klein says you should make a list of all symptoms and questions you have. Then be prepared to question your doctor’s diagnosis and opinions. Do as much research as possible beforehand. Then get a second opinion. In sum, this book could, indeed, save your life by empowering you with a better understanding of what you’re getting into with a doctor’s visit or one to a hospital.
Preheat the oven to 350 degrees. Prepare baking sheets lined with silicone baking mats or parchment paper. In a medium bowl, whisk together the flour, cocoa powder, baking soda, and salt. Using an electric mixer, cream together the butter, peanut butter, and sugars. Beat on medium-high speed until light and fluffy, approximately 1-2 minutes. Add in the egg, vanilla extract, and milkl blending until smooth. With the mixer on low speed, add in the dry ingredients just until incorporated. Gently fold in the chopped peanut butter cups.
like a sleepy blue ocean
Writers are readers, too. Promote yourself by promoting others.
Fullers Porter 500ml $8.50 - Dark & complex with layers of roasted malt bringing caramel, chocolate & coffee, as well as a touch of dark fruit.
What's not discussed is that in order to do this practice one must relinquish control of experience and emotion, relax the floodgates clenched to keep insecurity at bay. Often when one starts to relax control over what's allowed into the mind one (theoretically) opens to the difficult emotions and memories we suppress, push to the margins of consciousness. In order to hang on to the horse of Shinay, everything has to be OK, the darkness, the sadness, the despair, the hopelessness, greed, the insecurity and its causes, all that is true within the consistency of our being.
Lemme say the best loves in my world are also intense friendships. Even that, you will find, is far too rare for my liking. Powerful trust and comfort comes rarely on the open sea. But real love is based on more than what the adult world will offer both of us……So I ask you all to bring you’re A game to the table. Cause I want you well fed when I take your hand, put you in bed and snuggle up behind you in perfect comfort…..my arm wrapped around you …….making you safe and secure for the night.
I rounded up a couple that look a lot like our ottoman:
Now, here I am in Berlin. I don’t speak German, I don’t have a job or a place to live in a couple weeks (that’s a whole other story). I have met a couple of friends and am fortunate to have some family here; my brother, his wife and my four-month old nephew.
c:
Paul Moloney
- sas604, jalon. spain, 02/3/2012 14:49
a picture of Reagan’s face.
For several months, I collected tattoo designs. I found numerous samples on Tumblr and bookmarked them for future reference. I had initially wanted the phrase I got from the movie Eat, Pray, Love that goes like “Dolce far niente”, Italian for “the sweetness of doing nothing” done on the back of my left shoulder. I wanted it done in a cursive tattoo font. I am a very lazy woman – and I know it’s nothing to be proud of but that has always been the fact. Sloth is my middle name. I thought getting the said phrase inked on my body would sugarcoat such a name and make it appear cool.
66. Have lunch at a church festival
Stage 2 in Added Collect 20 assistant coins.
4 Tuning Up With Frank Zappa
Somehow, being 1/32 of any culture, gives you a bit of bragging rights, however, to use this as a means to obtain employment, is a bit of a stretch – and/or otherwise: working the system.
She realized about a year maybe two years ago, she could not let her daughter continue to mangle her grandson's relationship with his dad and his half siblings. And so the odd friendship was born.
A Safe Place is a place you can go in your mind that will calm you if your are stressed or afraid. A Safe Place is a good place to go before sleeping. Anyone who has been in harms way, such as my combat veteran clients, need to make this place very vivid in their mind because the "common cold" of combat experience is not being able to sleep well again -- sometimes, never again, especially those who do not believe that therapy works.
bowl. Poor guy had figured
Chiropractics and neuro-retraining
This is my entry for the very last Mystery Box Cupcake Challenge. The theme this month was "Fizzy." I have a bottle of my beloved Andre Spumante sitting around from the last time it was on sale at the grocery store, so I decided to make a champagne cupcake.
Happy Pinning!
Dear Heavenly Father! I thank You for giving me the strength and ability to face any challenge and win. Thank You for I am a winner in Christ Jesus! Amen!
They had a very uncomfortable chair in our shared room.
Really I never thought a sundae could be that good. My husband has asked me to replicate it twice since then, and I've done my best, but we'll definitely be going back and throwing elbows if we have to just to get another sundae.
The girls came home and played and it was just a great day.
1Now after a long time, when the Lord had given Israel rest from wars on every side, and Joshua was old and full of years,
Guest contributor, rap connoisseur and all around good dude Marc Lanza (@LanzDaddy) drops in to drop some knowledge. Check out his take on all the "Young Geezys":
The drive to impose a homogenised mono-culture across the Western world is perversely described as multiculturalism. Our leaders claim to be the champions of diversity, but its policies and aims are entirely the opposite and, in fact, the state will crush any dissent or divergence from the imposed orthodoxy.
9. Economic sanctions: Following through on the lobbying point above, in the case of nations that actively repress their citizens, encourage the U.S. government to impose economic sanctions against them. There are different types of sanctions, including the prohibition of investment in such nations, both of new investment and also retroactive bans, where companies which currently are active are required to suspend or divest their operations (activists would now like to see the U.S. enact a retroactive ban against Burma); and also such things as bans on arms sales and other forms of military assistance, the importation of goods from the country (e.g., the new Burma law), etc.
MIGRATION, HUMAN DISLOCATION, AND THE GOOD NEWS: MARGINS AS CENTRE IN CHRISTIAN MISSION AND CHALLENGE TO THEOLOGICAL EDUCATION
I didn’t buy today, because the sales associate noted that I was likely to grow even more in the next couple of months. BUT…I did try some on. AND……..it turns out that I had my size all wrong. The sales associate laughed at me when I told her that I had been trying on bras in size 40D. She said, “no no no – no way is your back that big.” I was so happy to hear those words I nearly kissed her!
Ok, maybe if you had your own personal, hot looking chef to cook and serve you dinner when you walked in the door from your busy day, but then again, who's spouse would really allow that?
2. Read @SteveButtry’s post about Digital First Ninja School. Considering what you heard from @JasonAWilliams and what you learned in Gateway, do you think the School of Journalism and Communication should do more to turn you into “digital ninjas” or “digital wizards”? If so, how? If not, what should the SOJC do instead? (Please refer to at least one site that is not Steve Buttry’s blog.)
1/2 teasp bicarb. soda
I colored Patsy with my Copic markers and used NitWit Collections Happy Born Day & Summer Splash for my DP (decorative papers). The ribbon, sunflower button, swirl & bling are all from my stash.
Anwaar: No! I need to go to Fareda!
“Nope.” Jess grinned. “You're coming with me.”
I've got a lot of random thoughts to share before I KA-POW you with the x-rated drawing. Don't worry, I'm going away soon so this is all you'll have to remember me by for the next two weeks or so. Here's one more thought before the dirty goods.
Greg Walton: “I feel the teachers do deserve to protest number 1 it’s just that they can’t because I was informed that by law they can’t.”
Domilise’s, located in the Uptown section of the city near the Prytania/Upperline area off of Tchoupitoulas street, however, is still going strong, and it has been for many decades. Regarded as one of the best sandwich shops in the city, It is a true Po’Boy shop in every respect, and makes them in a very traditional fashion, using real New Orleans French bread.
Years ago I had a boyfriend that would get his monthly bills and shove them in the drawer. I found that humorous. I would wonder “do you think that since they are out of view you don’t have to pay them and that you won’t be held accountable for them?” I watched as small bills which could have easily been managed grew into huge problems. Late fees and interest and finally a bill collector hounding payment. We are held accountable for all our actions. Action equals reaction. That is the law of karma.
Well its decided then, Bukit aman it is..
There are a number of Jameses in the New Testament who were alive when Jesus was. Some were related to Him, others were not. Some were among His Twelve, others were not. Some have been canonised, others have not. Some had mothers named Mary, others did not.
Rue de Cherche-Midi, and
Katsuya, we will see you again very soon!
I am also happy I didn't subject hubs to it, as he would have fallen asleep!
Until next time happy quilting and patchworking
I decided to add some dimension to the blue cardstock background, so used some Dylusion Ink Spray through a Cubist stencil.
One of the things I really liked about it was these guys finally got their due in the movies.....
You can see me in the shadows,
On Saturday, while nearly everyone obsessed with interior design was anxiously awaiting the newest issue of Lonny, I was out with my mom searching for antiques and some unique secondhand finds in Connecticut's Farmington Valley.
Soon, Hedy finds out a way how to hide radio signals sent from a ship to its torpedo. She notices that when a ship flips quickly from one radio channel to another, it is impossible for another ship to detect the signals it is sending. On the other hand, she has an alternative solution to the problem regarding the already sent signals reaching the torpedo’s radio – the radios of the ship and the torpedo have to change channels simultaneously. Together with her neighbor, George Antheil, a composer who has experimented with automated control of musical instruments, she submits her idea of a secret communication system in June 1941. As a result, in 1942 Hedy and George receive a U.S. Patent 2,292,387 for their invention. They name it the Secret Communication System.
I don’t want to be your friend
C. She has the most amazing 1997 flip phone.
Father: "A group of investors recognized you from last years Christmas party and transferred their portfolios to another firm."
Tom Taaffe IRE (Straffan, County Kildare, Ireland)
03 Sun Goes Down
including all the things I promised for the rest of the year
Yes, it's the CHAINED release day!
Q: What about for paper readers?
Wow, it definitely sucks to hear so many of you guys with bad credit card experiences!
At one time I was a hot shot developer, with a computer science degree from Harvard. After some experience as an individual contributer, I began to lead teams and manage large engagements in San Francisco and London. I enjoyed the leadership responsibilities and decided to go back to business school to prepare myself to run my own company.
To commemorate the 20th anniversary of TLC, the surviving members are working with VH1 on a made-for-TV movie series inspired by their story as well as a new album. In other good news, Chilli talks about possible new music!
I am left with one niggling doubt after this encounter. And I don't think it's a question I'll ever know the answer to. What do you think - did Jesus pay his fare or was he free-loading?
Argosy University: This is one well known university of the United States. The distinguishing feature of this university is that it allows its students to log on into online classes at any time of the day or night. Interpersonal skills are focused on and the instructors try to build up self confidence in the students.
Of course, since it was Saturday, the plumber didn't answer and I left a message. A few hours later, I left another message. A few hours later, I called another plumber, picked out of a hat. Fortunately, the second plumber came right away and showed me that the 25-year-old faucet on my kitchen sink was kaput. The water was still flowing because the cut-off taps were so old and stiff that I hadn't turned them all the way off. He didn't have a faucet in stock to replace it, so there was nothing he could do for me except charge me $100 for the service call.
Congrats! Our current challenge is listed in the next post...It's not meant to "Distress" you out! lol, sorry, couldn't help myself!
I'm cardmaking a little again now and getting back into the swing of things a bit more. I'm still not able to use my Cuttlebug and most of my punches, but I'm sure it won't be long before I will be getting back to normal. Off to see my surgeon tomorrow so hoping he'll be pleased with my recovery so far and gives me the 'all clear' to push myself a little harder.
Slender Sue is coiled tightly,
And thats after a desperat photo editing!!
While several Original Equipment Manufacturers have been vying for a foothold in the Chinese manufacturing segment, Cessna’s agreement with its Chinese counterparts has raised some questions about intellectual property protection. “The recent joint venture with Avic could have negative long-term implications for Cessna and the industry,” says Bank of America Merrill Lynch analyst Ronald J. Epstein.
If you already have some of the items, you can always subsitute them for something else as long as you spend £45.00 then you'll earn this or any other item from the Sale-a-Bration collection.
So I called his office leaving a detailed message and asking what tests or things I should be asking my GP about when I see him on Wednesday. The oncologist's nurse called me back a couple hours later after discussing my message with the doctor. They apparently pulled my medical file and looked it over. The doctor is "concerned that it very well could be a recurrence of Phyllodes" and wants to see me "asap", so I was given an appointment for Monday at 11:00AM (central usa time).
Well, right now they are really tired. The plane ride to California was a very hard one. Trevin didn't sleep at all, and considering that we didn't arrive until 9:40, that's not a great thing. And Tyson squirmed for the first 2 hours of the flight then finally fell asleep for the last hour. I was a sweaty, frazzled mess after that flight and Tyson wasn't too comfortable either! Now we're making up for lost sleep, which is pretty much impossible. Since there's more to update as far as both boys are concerned, I'll save those for later posts...
it's socially conscious, too. from their FAQ:
"Welcome to heaven. Nirvana. Whatever you want to call it, our Peanut Butter & White Chocolate DrizzleCorn takes you there. This sweet-and-salty, creamy and crunchy delight will blow you away!
The girl’s father roared, “You bit….”
As a result of all this, death is treated more casually by Africans than by Westerners. I, and I suspect most Africans, am completely inured to reports of African suffering, for whatever cause. Drought causes crops to fail, thousands face starvation? Yup, that happened many times while I was growing up. Inter-tribal rivalry and warfare causes wholesale slaughter? Yep, been happening there for millennia, long before Whitey got there. Governments becoming rich and corrupt while their populations starved? Not more than nine or ten of those. In my lifetime, the following tragedies have occurred, causing untold millions of deaths: famine in Biafra, genocide in Rwanda, civil war in Angola, floods in South Africa, famine in Somalia, civil war in Sudan, famine in Ethiopia, floods in Mozambique, wholesale slaughter in Uganda, and tribal warfare in every single country. There are others, but you get the point.
Part of me wants to celebrate what appears to be strong sustained job growth signaling the steady march toward normalcy. The other part is sobered by the realization that at his pace that march will take many years. But every journey starts with a single step - or something like that - so I am still in glass half full mode.
In my mind, I instantly started up my inner design App. I drew window boxes on the windows full of long hanging vines and brilliant red flowers. I imagined painting the wrought iron fence and gate white, and planting lavender beside it for luck, of course. I could see my beloved white rocking chairs sitting on the porch. I realize that my love of all things Austen romanticism make my imagination run away very quickly!
they were a pack I have had for a long time...
In the CBN interview that aired last week, Ryan highlighted an additional principle of Catholic social teaching that informs his engagement in public policy: the principle of subsidiarity. CONTINUED
It was also $18.98, and is by La Fee.
Wouldn’t you know it. I had checked in on Foursquare the morning before. Not only had I checked in on Foursquare, but I had stolen the mayorship from Asmâa. So it was clear to all that I had been there the day before.
So onto this weeks photo. I give you, one of the most peaceful bridges I've seen in a while.
A recent study regarding BPA in soup cans caught a lot of attention. The peer-reviewed study released in November found that people who ate canned soup every day had a more than 1,200 percent increase in BPA in their urine samples. The study is already prompting boxed soups to advertise their BPA-free status.
There's LOTS more fun pieces, but I just have to show y'all the two last rooms in our house that have been left untouched.
My eyes burned. I hadn’t blinked since my ass met the chair. Still, he continued, just as calm as he had been when he was making some kind of sense.
Premise (5) is the key here. Craig supports this with the idea that impersonal causes are always sufficient to produce their effects. In other words, if the cause is present, so too must the effect be present. This is supposed to create a problem since it would mean that if the cause is eternal, so too must the effect be eternal. But since it is a key part of Craig’s argument that the universe is not eternal, the cause cannot therefore be impersonal.
When I was younger and actually lived at home, I could always look forward to the annual epic leading-to-divorce battle of decorating the house for Christmas. Putting up the tree. Setting up the nativity scene. Putting those stupid stuffed reindeer all over the house. Placing hundreds and hundreds of dollars worth of stupid superficial shit all around the house that only my obsessive fucking mother gives a damn
Tough Shit: Life Advice from a Fat, Lazy Slob Who Did Good was released on March 20, 2012 by Gotham, an imprint of Penguin Group.
1 TB ground flax seed (optional)
Apart from the issues with the FIFA, TTFF, Police, Media and IC, the energy industry has been having a tumultuous week that has been overshadowed. Ministers Bhoe Tewarie and Kevin Ramnarine are embroiled in transactions with Saudi Arabia that led to the US having to levy a boof on the PM and now moves to privatise Trinmar seem suspicious. Is the national patrimony being sold? And if so are members of this govt lining themselves up to benefit from the sales while the country continues to suffer?
The atrium at our new church is not small. It was a good 50 running steps from our brunch to the beginning of the preschool wing. Heels are not meant for running ... and while I'm at it, I should tell you my undergarments were not either.
Water-leaf capital. A late 12th century capital with a leaf shape that is broad, unribbed, and tapering, curving out towards the angle of the abacus and turned in at the top. (An abacus is the flat slab on the top of a capital.)
Would you like to know why I plan my menu every week? You probably don’t, but I’m going to tell you anyway. I plan my menu every week because every Monday I strip beds, catch up all the laundry from the weekend, clean out the refrigerator, and do most of the major household and garden chores for the week, on top of homeschooling Jared, writing part time for an internet content company, and caring for our animals.
A careless price to pay for an already wealthy
else is a criminal but someone in possession of a valuable commodity -
2 Timothy 3:2 For men will be lovers of self, lovers of money, boasters, arrogant, revilers, disobedient to parents, unthankful, unholy,
Reich), if there's one thing that makes Bush a love-or-hate,
Reed, famous for its insularity, perhaps wants to become more open and engaged in Oregon. Or perhaps the same qualities that made him a successful candidate for Attorney General were evident in the interview process - he knows how to talk a good game and get folks to open their wallets. I, personally, hope it is at least some of the former. I think Reed has lost some of its luster partly because of its stubborn unwillingness to evolve. Perhaps that is still a strength, but I think less and less so in the 21st century.
I guess that I wrote more about what’s happening within me than around me. At least that's how it is on WTCS. I guess this has something to do with what i was going through when I wrote the songs.
Hans Hartmann
# 3 peace with God now because of our relationship with Lord Yahushua through faith. (Matthew 11:28; Hebrews 4:1, 3 and 8-11)
ALL ARTWORK IS COPYRIGHTED BY PETER CAMPOFIORI, IT IS ILLEGAL TO PUBLISH OR PRINT ANY SUCH ARTWORK OR TEXT WITHOUT WRITTEN PERMISSION BY THE ARTIST.
I’m sure most people think writers are blobs of fat with fast fingers and a brain that lights up like a light bulb. Well, that’s what I think of occasionally and it forces me out of my chair and outside. Plus, who knows that could happen that will inspire you? And who knows what pile of animal feces the dog will pull you into or which biker will attempt to run over you from behind? There are endless possibilities while running outside on a trail. Luckily, the positives of smelling wind, seeing red wing black birds, hawks and the occasional deer make it worth while. Would a wolf or mountain lion be better, sure, but that’s where imagination serves the writer so well. =)
With the colorful walls and the ironically black bedding, it was clear that the pink ceiling fan with flowers and butterflies was affecting the overall chi in the room.
Matt Bomer is perfect
Sundays are are a great day to stay in Merida and tour the city because so much is going on. Many museums have free entrance on Sundays, whereas on weekdays entrance is between 30-70 pesos depending on the museum.
I used to think my Dad hated me when I was a child. At that time, being in the moment of the abuse, it was the only reason I could contribute to the fact that he could have done the things that he did. I now know that there were other factors at play. As inexcusable as some of the experiences of my childhood were, I forgive my Dad. We have never spoken about the things that I am about to reveal. I don’t think we ever will. I do know that he regrets it. He doesn’t have to tell me, I can see it in his eyes when we talk now. There is a residual sadness there. And I am Okay. I am okay with where I am in my life. I am okay with who I am. I am not in need of resolution, closure or retribution so as much as I love my Dad, now, I am going to let it rest and leave it for him to come to terms with. He is going to have to do a lot of soul-searching after all, now that the clock is ticking for him.
From what I have read from numerous comments on this blog is that in a lot of cases it was a bit of a wake up call for a lot of people.
May 8 – African American Genealogy (conducted by Sylvester Lewis) and Military Records (conducted by Jim Johnson)
On Friday I went to the National Engineering and Construction recruitment fair in Birminham to see what opportunities there might be for Queen Mary Students and Graduates. The results were surprisingly upbeat. After quite a difficult recruitment year in 2009, things are starting to look up for this sector.
06. Looney Tunes (Jim Tolliver, Rick Steele, Chuck Witherow, W.Gregory, Roger Pavlica) - 8:05
The most basic reality required for such a project should always have been cultural. Europe stretches from the Saxon Protestant ethic of the north and centre, down to the Latin Catholic ethic to the south-centre and south. In its enlarged (some would say engorged) form today, its aspirations stretch to the Slavic cultures of the East, and to Arab-influenced Islam at the very edge of south-eastern Europe.
The City of Bloomington Arts Commission (BAC) Announces Its April 2012 Grant Recipients
some beautiful images from our sponsor and the
My final total was $5.68 and I have a $3 RR remaining.
Remember the Night wasn't marketed as a holiday movie -- it was released January 19, 1940, and besides, such a thing was almost unheard of then -- but it's one of the best and least-known. It was a hit in 1940, with Stanwyck and MacMurray already showing the sexy chemistry that would play to more sinister effect four years later in Double Indemnity. The picture was visible on TV through the 1960s and into the '70s, but was out of circulation for decades. Now that Turner Classic Movies and Universal (which owns the pre-1948 Paramount library) have partnered up to issue it on DVD, it surely won't be long before it becomes as popular and beloved as It's a Wonderful Life. Well, okay, maybe not entirely as much -- Wonderful Life has a mighty powerful mystique -- but I'm betting it won't be far behind.
I sold close to 300 books by selling in my town, and heard very positive responses especially from the children 9-12 years old.
Looking forward to the weeks to come!!
I have mixed feelings about Paula Deen these days because of what has happened to her show. I have talked about this before. I have seen her cook things from scratch. I have seen her cook outside of the comfort zone of her own sphere of cuisine (such as Italian and French dishes). I have seen her cook things with reasonable amounts of fat. Buried under that Food-Network-generated image there is someone who is somewhat competent - more so than some of her colleagues, although less so than many others. Her food may not be your cup of tea, but I'm not so sure all of it needs to be demonized.
And she makes a liar out of me in public all the time by sitting quietly and watching the world go by. =)
Go Caps!
The newest installment of the Bourne franchise does not have Jason Bourne in it?! What madness is this? This new film stars Jeremy Renner as another government trained agent, Aaron Cross, who much like Bourne, kicks a ton of ass. The shoulders are heavy on Renner because stepping into a franchise without its leading star is a hard thing to do. The film is actually based on a later book not written by Robert Ludlum, but continues the story after the original trilogy. This could be a lot of fun and a great return to a cool franchise that might leave it open so that Matt Damon can return as Bourne himself.
The last part of our New England adventure was Wednesday and Thursday of last week (and yet it seems like ages ago already...). We moved on from Concord, MA to Plymouth, MA (there are Plymouths everywhere) and spent a day there back in the seventeenth century. First we boarded the reproduction of the Mayflower (well, first we had a really nice lunch at a cafe by the sea... but after that we headed to the ship). The staff on the Mayflower II were really helpful (some just technical, some in costume and thoroughly living 1620 style). We also saw the (purely symbolic) Plymouth rock. Photos of this visit below:
Whomp Charmz Poised to become the next Sillybandz, these cute, colorful rubbery charms are also erasers. They can connect to the aforementioned bandz or clip on to laces, ear bud cords, computer cables and such. I don't recall the price, but it was reasonable for a pack of 8. I almost bought these for my son, you know, so he could be a trendsetter and all, but then I remembered the 236 silly bandz he has scattered around his bedroom and figured I'd let someone else's child have the spotlight.
After a rambling tour lasting about 20 minutes through a festive town, I clambered out at the stop where I had joined the trip earlier, feeling as gleeful as a kiddie and having been photographed as often as a world-famous filmstar.
So, UKUnpublished sees its company as a ‘hybrid’ of publishing. I can accept that, but authors need to understand that services like this are not a substitute for mainstream publishing. It is what it says – a hybrid – taking elements of what is available from traditional and high end service publishing.
Thursday, December 27th–Therapy.
3 JPN 5 1 1 1 2 5
Casts : Lee Donghae
This was a tough time in our lives. Anna was going through some tough stuff related to her adoption. We started seeking help for her PTSD. And although her diagnosis gave us a sense of relief the therapy she needed from us took every single ounce of energy. That was almost 3 years ago; she's come so far since then. In these pictures I see a six year old holding onto her toddler sisters hand for dear life. She wouldn't let go because Abigail made her literally feel safe. Abigail still does that for her. Just last weekend we were at a function and Anna entered a room that was too crowded, too noisy, too much stimulation for her to feel safe and Abigail wouldn't hold her hand. Anna left that scary situation so fast. Now that she's older she doesnt' make Abigail protect her. She now knows how to find us instead. But there's a sister bond there that amazes me. Imagine that a four year old would make an eight year old feel whole and safe? Amazing.
Then knock ‘em all the Hell.
A rather unpleasant weekend the other week. Woken in the middle of Friday night by an agitated stomach, I ended up spending all of Saturday and most of Sunday in bed or in the bathroom. As I lay on there on Saturday morning I was fearing the worst and considering the possibility of swine flu: aching limbs? – Check!, High temperature? – Check! Upset stomach? – Check! But then……Sore Throat?…erm no! Sneezes? Ermmmm no again. Whatever it was it wasn’t swine flu but it laid me low and buggered off just in time for me to to go to work on Monday morning. I was knackered though and when I got home I had a bit of tea (dinner) and then went to bed at 7:00pm. I woke at 7:30am a different man. I wonder how many others have got it and claimed they had succumbed to the pandemic?
8: I want an i-Pod/Whiny Kid
As you have to do with the foundation, you need to choose the right color and type of BB Cream.
We, the people have only allowed one man through election to be the President of the United States. We have, in fact, granted him or her complete command of the military, and total autonomy over the Executive Branch of government.
Has brought me to His voice
(The Gypsy Horse is a hearty little draft horse which was developed by and is currently used by the Gypsies of England and Ireland. They typically stand between 13 and 15.2 hands, and have an unusually quiet and gentle disposition. Their exceptional stamina allows them to go all day at a steady trot while pulling a loaded living wagon with the whole Gypsy family. They are sturdily built with solid bone and have a good deal of feathering and hair. The Gypsy horse comes in all colours, with the most common being the "pinto" patterns, piebald and skewbald. Although they have been bred for a particular type for generations, they are originally descended from several draft horse and pony breeds, namely the Shire and Clydesdale along with Dales, Fell and other native British breeds.)
That said, very few things make me more profoundly sad and angry than when I hear about kids being so upset by bullying that they take their own lives.
“Thanks to them, the State of Israel will continue to develop and prosper, and thanks to them the members of the younger generation will also be able to live their lives in security and tranquility,” he told the families.
Are there any among us that cannot sympathize with the panic many of us feel this time of year? Check out me-ander and It's "That" Time of The Year, Again, Food Inventory. As someone who has tremendous anxiety in the weeks before Passover, I can so relate to this.
We have scarcely tried to give any food to the soul, which is distinct from the body and mind; therefore we are all committing suicide in the proper sense of the term. The message of the Ācāryadeva is to give us a warning to halt such wrong activities. Let us therefore bow down at his lotus feet for the unalloyed mercy and kindness he has bestowed upon us.
The whole thing has developed a life of its own. Some bloggers are understandably upset about the comments from the platform of the Head Kevin, seemingly offered to his beardy, sandal-wearing activist base to give them an Aunt Sally to shy at should the matter come before them in the future. Some defend the Kevin position - if you aren't a Kevin, put up or shut up. If you are, have your say.
P.S. 011 Purvis J. Behan
This is how my Front Porch looks now, decorated for Winter.......
Lime juice from half a lime
Also given the congenital political correctness within the US political establishment it is not inconceivable for a bold sociopath with dark skin, a small group of enablers and a media which frantically wanted to believe, to go all the way to the top without ever having to prove who he is. People such as Bill Ayres, Nancy Pelosi and Rahm Emanuel would know that and may well have exploited it.
The first thing that strikes us both is the loss of Ian and Barbara. The Doctor is getting better at saying goodbye to his companions, but as an audience member I truly feel the programme will never be the same without the terrific twosome.
I observed his lonely walk the following morning and the morning after that. The next day I left the blinds down. There was plenty of light. I wondered about getting curtains, something fine and filmy that wouldn’t obscure the view, but would stop people from seeing in.
In fairness to my mother (God rest her soul) and my inherent clumsiness, I only started the doing-what-I-love part in the last year or two so I guess I’m a long way from having…another cliche…hang on…”paid my dues.” Cliches hurt almost as much as those parking meters…
All the same, there are people for whom there really does seem to be a difference, and that is why I think what President Obama did was brave, and fine, and, most of all, true. So I am hanging out more flags.
Towards the end I wasn't sure what I was watching. Body horror or Brothers Grimm. Either way it was fascinating and strange. I tried very hard to work out what was going on with Halpin's transformation and the secondary brains thing. I loved the idea of both, but found it immensely difficult to make them work in my head. A couple of lines of explanation here and there would have satisfied me a great deal. But it would be wrong to try and take this story as just a normal tv narrative. It's not meant to be and I should get over that. If nothing else the transformation was a perfect reflection of Abraham Lincoln's quote about a strong desire to see those who argue for slavery have it tried on them personally. I happen to know that my wide-eyed colleague has thoughts on all this that make perfect rational sense, so over to you!!
Imagine the scene, Friday night at Selfridges caught between MAC and Illamasqua with a DJ pumping out Candi Staton, Michael Jackson and En Vogue. Women swatching left right and centre, excited chatter in the air, credit cards beep beeping and heels click clicking.
Graduation is this Saturday. Current undergrad students are scrambling to finish their finals, faculty are busy administering and grading assignments and staff are scurrying to get everything in place for graduation. In the midst of our business it’s nice to look back at our heritage and see how far Crown College has come since the institution’s founding in 1916. Staff & faculty have changed. Thousands of students have come and gone. Yet, the mission of Crown has stayed centered on its mission of training Christians to serve and influence the world for Christ. So here is the story of Crown College.
I phoned Nodge and asked him: 'Why is the stick so long?'
I think in pictures. Pictures and words. The sculpting of words together... the forming, the pressing here, removing there... it is the closest I can come to sharing mind pictures.
1 haaah
Right now, tucked up a lamp-post on the South side of Dublin alongside hundreds of other works of art is this poster below just begging to have a moustache drawn on it.
Mmmm....pancakes. Lately, I have been indulging in the boxed variety. Yes, the brand we use is sugar-free, but still...it's not exactly the healthiest breakfast choice. Cue to this Paleo Pancake recipe from the Detoxinista. Now, I'm not really "up" on this latest diet trend, but from what I have gathered (pun intended...read along and you'll get it), a paleo diet is one that mimics what our hunter-gatherer (see!) ancestors ate. No, gluten. Whatever. I just know this concoction is delish.
“Being on the list means that you made a mark within gastronomy,” Redzepi said.
And tonight I did it. I went to boot camp. And oh my lordy me, did it hurt. But that's ok. I imagine that it will absolutely cane tomorrow. But that's ok too. I fronted up tonight and did the hardest workout I reckon I've ever done, and it felt good (ask me again in the morning....) And I'm going to keep going for the full three months, because when Christmas rolls around, the only red-faced, roundy-bellied person in my house will be Santa.
I was right, she is a natural. They both are. They were comfortable, relaxed and quite the cutest couple. I am glad to know the GEICO telephone made its way back to Josh. Congrats to the both of you and I am very, very happy for the 2 of you.
Homegrown
Fortunately about 10 metres after the roundabout there is a pelican crossing, and the lights were on red so we stopped to let the people cross.
4. Melt the chocolate candy melts the same as the orange.
Sure Thing: Visual Effects; Best Bet: Sound Editing; Possible: Andy Serkis (Supporting Actor), Sound Mixing
22But the fruit of the Spirit is love, joy, peace, patience, kindness, goodness, faithfulness, 23gentleness and self-control. Against such things there is no law. 24Those who belong to Christ Jesus have crucified the sinful nature with its passions and desires. 25Since we live by the Spirit, let us keep in step with the Spirit. Galatians 5:22-25 (NIV)
And sufficient is Allah's Statement in this matter:
We started in this corner, with the bookshelf. Right away, she made some boxes for me to put stuff in. We had Donate, Office/School supplies, To Go Through Later, Toys, and Half-Price books. At first it was hard to start, but once I got going, it was pretty easy. I decided that this room is a good place for the school/office supplies, so as I got areas cleared, she got that stuff put away. You can see, in the very corner, about 3 boxes that I need to go through. They have things like picture frames, music cds, and important papers I need to file. The grocery bags are either books that have already gone to Connor's classroom, or outgrown clothes that have been passed on to a friend's 4 year old son. The white box has school supplies, and is now next to the computer (which you will see below). The white basket tower thing now has 2 sections for projects, a section where I put things to put away later (and I'm not allowed to let it get full!), and some empty binders that I'll use when I file my patterns. I also plan to take another pass through the bookshelf and maybe weed out some more books. The drawers are completely clean and organized with office and school supplies.
(Atlantic) Ocean, it was really wavy and cold the second time we went.
The problem with having a day without dancing, is that it's all too easy to fill it up with too much tango.
NAR developed the At Home with Diversity course in 1998 in cooperation with the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development. The day-long certification course is designed to meet the nation’s fair housing commitment by educating and equipping NAR’s Realtor members with the tools they need to expand homeownership opportunities for the growing number of culturally diverse buyers entering the housing market.
half of our body is illuminated, and half of our body is in dark shadow.
And there really is something for everyone on the menu. Even crumpets with Irish butter and local New England maple syrup, a childhood favorite of mine. There are vegetarian options like the grilled cheese and tomato sandwich or a mozzarella and roasted vegetable panini (crunchy, good and filling), soups du jour and four or five cake and pie choices that always look delicious.
My friend Jason has recently been telling me about a book called The Spirit Level by Richard Wilkinson. Coincidentally, data from this book also turned up in Ill Fares the Land, Tony Judt's polemical book on Social Democracy which I bought last year in one of my favourite London bookshops.
I am also adamant that people should move to electronic hearing protection, if just for better communications. In a class last year, I had a shooter running a protection drill who ended up pushing the principal down behind cover, and then looked up to locate the bad guys. He was pointing his muzzle at the principal's lower back the entire time...with his finger on the trigger. Since he had non-electronic hearing protection on his head, he couldn't hear me yelling at him to wake the fuck up...until I hit him with a flying body tackle at a dead run and buried his face in the gravel of the range, and jerked the muffs off long enough to tell him to get the fuck off my range.
There are many more holidays, but after putting in all of this work, my favorite holiday became very obvious. Without a doubt, my favorite holiday is Meck-Dec-Day, celebrating the signing of the Mecklenburg Declaration of Independence. I know nothing about this holiday, so I have nothing bad to say about. Ergo, it wins by default.
*Brow wax every 6 weeks
I was turned onto these guys while living in S.F. by my neighbor and friend Eric Meade. Dude made me tapes loaded with some of the best hc I've to this day ever heard. Thanks Eric, I owe you for sure.
Your apple peels with be all discolored and sad looking now, like the picture below. You can throw them away, or compost them now.
I’ve loved traditional music since I was a child. One of the themes of the book is what you pass down to the next generation. In an early draft, a character tells Josie that we can still hear the dead talk through the songs that are passed down through the ages. I believe that. I wanted a way to link the book into the voices of the people of the time.
* Techniques (usingpinking sheers, hand stitching, making puffy accents)
First - my reasoning is not superficial. Sometimes I have been repetitive though because Doberman allows Albeus to spew his hatred on the blog and he is repetitive ad nauseum, the very thing that Vanilla Ice accused me of.
Please feel free to enter card, layouts, altered items or anything else handcrafted!
these are some little containers that I'm going to put nail polish remover in. i love the one my aunt has at her salon! these are considerably cheaper however, so its a win win. I'm going to love just pushing the cotton ball down on the top and getting remover on it.
The only thing that slows the criminals down is the vigilant diligence of "The Ranger Protection Service!"
Do you know the feeling of spending a significant portion of time reading a rather long novel and when you reach the conclusion you are actually sad to say goodbye to the complex and interesting characters that inhabit the story? I experience this phenomonon with the occasional book. This is exactly how I felt about Cutting for Stone by Abraham Verghese.
Now, you know I like to argue, and I love a good debate
Oh dance in the dark of night,
All children are unique, they are wonderful souls and a joy to be around. But what do you do when your children are bright? Maxi and Mini are both above average when it comes to intelligence. I say this not as a smug mum, but as a concerned mum. My aim for my children is and always has been happiness, for them to take life in both hands and enjoy it. But this last week I have experienced something I never have before, Maxi has not wanted to go to school, as it is boring.
Conquest of the Southland
So, having said that where does it leave us? Well, if we take a look at the top three in the event Bolt was 10.02 the season before his breakout year (9.69 the following year); Gay was 10.06 the season before his breakout year (9.84 the following year); and Powell was 10.02 the season before his breakout year (9.87 the following year). So any of these guys could potentially be the one. If I were going to say who I thought had the best chance it would have to be Dix, Williams and Bailey. They have the best overall set of skills to make that move to the next level. Gatlin is the elephant in the room – the guy that could change everything.
Go visit her site for the recipe. I had all of the ingredients prepared pie crusts, 4 Tomatoes, salt and pepper, scallions and basil, freshly grated cheese and mayonnaise(we use Vegenaise). We have 1/2 of a pie left for another evening. Besides the pie we had a big salad, and a bowl of cherries.
Back of the Book
Well, if you know anything about me or you’ve been a loyal reader lately (thank you:)), you know very well that I wonder “what if…” about a lot of things. I think it has something to do with my anxiety–duh right?!
Women too. Obviously. And yes, we are here to learn to have joy. This scripture isn't talking about being "happy" all the time, not pleasure and not giddiness. When it talks about joy, to my understanding, it is referring to a state of being that a human has to choose. Joy is a state that a person has to foster in themselves and is partly dependent on other choices that they make; because while you can choose what you will, good or ill, you do not get to choose the consequences, and some consequences are harder to live with than others. Some consequences make choosing and experiencing joy harder to do. Harder, but it can be done. And that's a darn good thing, because sometimes we make choices that have consequences that spill onto others, and make it harder for others to have joy.
like leather. The third one in is a real photo of my Mom and her sister
In Australia it is still illegal for homosexuals to marry, although girls kissing girls has become common, particularly in the celebrity scene.
(a) The heat of the oven expands the air and gas in the dough, which causes the gluten framework to distend.
12. Heart Attack Man
Feeling thankful for snail mail. Ryan sent me Modern Family, K sent me a notecard, HJ sent me a postcard, and my mom has sent oodles. It's really nice to open up your mailbox and have something besides junk mail. It's weird to think that R probably got the card I sent today. I don't expect a response from him, but just thinking about him reading it has an effect on me.
Bearded Mouleff, wearing grey trousers and an orange sweatshirt, was aided by an interpreter through the hearing.
Something along the lines of this happened to me when I was five years-old. After being suspended, for a day from kindergarten for trying to escape from my teacher’s brutal regime and flee to chinatown with my best friend, my mother talked to me about college.
Over the Hill (Events)
The “all men” included now, the Jews who, now, according to Romans 2:16, will be judged according to Paul’s gospel.
A minnie mouse party in the midst of everything else going on with the holidays? Yup.
(a’) I prefer to stay dry.
Best Sound Design MATILDA THE MUSICAL Simon Baker – Cambridge
Aventinus Eisbock
13. New Way to Bleed
1 dictum
These guys went back to school this morning and now it's just me alone at the computer. We had a great summer with lots of adventures and plenty of time for sleeping late and reading. But enough is enough. While neither was too happy about the impending onslaught of homework, truth be told, they were looking forward to seeing friends (many of whom had decamped Paris over the summer) and being back in a kidcentric place.
- Whole grain fibers
And yet, I know, that he does love me. But there are days, when I just need to KNOW that my life doesn’t end here, at the terrible days of my youth, which I’m starting to look back on in graveness and hostility. I don’t want my teens/ early 20’s to be defined by loneliness and pathetic-ness, but I’m starting to think this is my life-song. Sad, right?
I wrote this so long ago and it is incomplete, but I wanted to post it anyway. Funny to post it in the middle of a heat wave here in New England. 98 degrees expected tomorrow!!!!!
Learning about the history and discovery of penicillin got us excited to conduct two more experiments to learn about the conditions that encourages mould growth. What was different this time round was that Tiger was asked to make a prediction of the outcome for each experiment, and I explained to him that the scientific term for making a guess is called hypothesis.
She looks at me with a mixture of triumph and tenderness. She then unties her tunic and appears naked, her muscular and well proportioned body offered for all to see.
All the cabinets are set and in place. We kept the upper ones and a single bottom one from before... but purchased simple, unfinished base cabinets to fill in the under side. We needed to do this after making room for the new dishwasher.
"And he has given us this command: Whoever loves God must also love his brother." 1 John 4:21
and, thus lubed for action, weaved
“After these things I looked, and behold, a great multitude which no one could count, from every nation and all tribes and peoples and tongues, standing before the throne and before the Lamb.” Revelation 7:9
I got some really lovely Washi tapes the other day.
For me, Foer’s words would be reiterated in another way by Brian Walsh the following evening when he would tell those of us, at Cornerstone’s Philosophy conference, that we must have a sense of hunger and that our art, work and lives must make people hungry. Hungry for God, hungry for a new, better kingdom now. This hunger should drive us, and compel others.
By Georgia Cates
But the question’s good enough
So anyway, that's how I got a big, bloody fingerprint on the front cover of my high school yearbook.
I am on of the people you know that is always trying to out run the bad feelings….
face of stone:
Over and over
Eleventh Doctor
This exhibition is made possible by the Department of Visual Arts at the University of Chicago.
(Congratulations The STARS! )
Governmentium has a normal half-life of 3.5 years; it does not decay, but instead undergoes a reorganization in which a portion of the assistant neutrons and deputy neutrons exchange places.
Some crack references…and then we get to the tranny jokes. Muller begins, “‘Knowledge is Power’ is a false maximum perpetrated by ugly people with saggy boobs and small penises,” to which a “Sanuk_D” replies: “Are you talking about the tranny on your corner?”
vanilla. Pour 1/2 custard in pastry shell. Top with remaining peanut butter
I decided to get away from the traditional Alice colors for her outfit. I think she looks positively pretty in pink!
Have you had any Word disasters?
“I think that her being gay has nothing to do with her coaching skills,” parent Tiniqua Smith told KDAF. “She has not tried to push this off on the kids, and I don’t feel like that should be a problem.”
I began to pray for myself. I asked that God would help me combat the forces keeping me awake. Ouch, Lord. Ouch! And a hot flash, really? But as I pray, I began thinking about all of the people I am blessed to know who are standing in much bigger need of prayer. I didn’t really want to , to be truthful. I wanted to complain and be grumpy. But….Names and faces, appearing in my mind, rapid-fire….until there is no room to worry about lesser things. I lay still (and blanket-less) and try to concentrate.
Welcome to What's Shakin' Wednesday! This is where I will share with you updates on my Body by Vi Challenge and shake recipes. You're not going to want to miss this transformation. I'm 7 pounds down. Ignore the inches...my chest fluctuates which accounts for most of the inches. My beautician said that it's because I'm not taking in caffeine. Who knows, all I know is that I'm losing weight and inches. I lost 1.5 inches in my hips and 2 inches in my waist.
Those are just his Google followers.
So, where on Earth is everyone buying shorts from these days?
Bo Bunny Paper
In order to bring the greatest frightfests to his stage Tod wisely ravaged the literature, folklore and real life events of recent history in order to show his talents to greatest advantage. During his stage career he brought such tales and legends to life as Jekyll and Hyde, Spring Heeled Jack, Sherlock Holmes, Jack the Ripper, Burke and Hare and, of course, his arguably most famous theatrical creation, Sweeney Todd, and some of these roles he would later reprise in film.
receives the privilege of meeting Alice
The disquiet is hard to pinpoint but this morning’s remembrance gave me a foothold. My dreams have centered around someone I care about being taken, bound, restrained and pained and the crux of saving them lies with me figuring the answers to hidden messages. Such clarity in the dreams of the captors, sweat beading on their brow, the smell of fear, the tension, and the urgency for me to see, see what I can’t see in the puzzle to save them.
But I didn’t have much stage experience, and I didn’t really know how I was going to get any. So when a few friends started up a small opera collaborative, I jumped on in, figuring I’d get to sing a little and get some time on stage.
These photos are from the old Eldon Square bus concourse which closed in 2007 and was replaced by the new bus station which was built as part of the regeneration of the Eldon Square Shopping Centre.
Finally, Jonathan’s pair was up. He was in the 3rd-to-last pair, originally paired to skate with Havard Bokko, a skater on a similar level with Jonathan; unfortunately, Havard was sick that weekend and pulled out of the 5k, so his fellow Norwegian teammate Sverre Lunde Pedersen skated in the pair instead. He’s a good skater, but young and not quite at Jonathan’s level. Having a well-matched pair is useful, both for increased motivation during the race and to be able to get a good draft during the lane-change in the back straightaway, so this new pairing was stressful – but Jonathan’s skated with slow pairs before, and managed alright – plus you never know when a young skater will have a crazily fast breakout race.
First of all, you can get just about anything here. Aside from the obvious things you're all going to point out. I mean besides those. But you walk into a grocery or department store here, and you might as well be in America. The aisles are well-stocked with familiar brands, there are never shortages of food staples, and the prices aren't outrageous. You can get decent-quality fresh fruits and vegetables, meats, seafood, and dairy products. The few things I can't find regularly - ricotta cheese, crumbled feta, ginger ale - are not really a big deal, and it makes me oh so excited when I do find them. Appliances, electronics, home goods, and clothes are in similarly abundant supply. There's both 110 and 220 volt outlets and appliances, so no need to worry about which to choose.
Hello Friends! Happy New Year!
We see no evidence, and see no reason to suspect, that any organic certifying agents would allow organic food manufacturers to violate the federal standards by adding this synthetic sweetener.
The Baroness made clear she was not calling for religious leaders to have the final say on government and social matters.
I could talk about this book for days and months and years, so let me just tell you what a few of the fancy reviewers had to say:
Extreme More than words US
October 21, 1911 saw the release of Der Müller und sein Kind (The Miller and his Child), currently believed to be the oldest surviving Austrian film. Although it was based on a romantic melodrama written by the dramatist Ernst Raupach, it contains enough supernatural elements to be included here. The plot concerns a poor miller's son who wants to wed a rich miller's daughter, but her father is vocally against the romance. A dramatic turn of events sees the death of the girl and her father, both of which are foreshadowed by the appearances of the bird of death and a ghost appearing in a gothic graveyard. Interestingly, the same production company (Kolm/Fleck) had made the same movie the previous year, but none of that footage is believed to have survived.
“Yes…my friend.” Guus held the man’s deep brown eyes. They were like that of an animal’s. “And you. Where do you fit into this? Why are you here in this cage?”
Probably the main argument for demolition has been that the site can be redeveloped and put to good use. Most people think they are an eyesore and because the land is so flat they can be seen for miles around.
So I asked why he was smiling and as though his smile couldn’t get brighter it magically did and he responded, “Its all I’ve got to offer right now”. This made me smile and as simply as that it had rubbed off onto me
Uses the love underpinning life,
4. Media
I keep neglecting my blog. I know this, and there's been no help for it save for me to put some strict limitations on other things that have kept me occupied in ways I perhaps should not be. Prudence, self control, and the other good virtues in which I seem to be lacking these days, have nudged my shoulder.
9. Bake for approx 40 mins on 160degrees
He also said that the urgency of the situation is underscored by the ongoing seismic activity around northeast Japan, in which 13 earthquakes of magnitude 4.0 to 5.7 have occurred off the northeast coast of Honshu between April 14 and April 17.
Still, as a left-leaner, I wish all these corporations that own so many papers would be more realistic about a lower profit margin and stop trying to live up to the 30 percent they were making back in the 1970s and early 1980s. The bean counters have definitely affected the quality of newspapers.
½ pint whole blood
But all in all larger framed men and women don’t have issues with body because we’re big ok…………
Wait, where the fuck are they?
To say I’m stunned at the flood of contracts and offers that have come my way in the last few months would be an understatement. And to say I’ve got this “beyond me,” “all about Him” lifestyle mastered as a result would be…well, a lie. In fact, the busier I become trying to accomplish all this writing/speaking/teaching on the “all about Him” life, the more I find myself fighting my “all about me” tendencies.
It was then that the American let him go. I am not sure if he even helped my dad assemble a bicycle so he can get to Lubao much faster. In a way, the bicycle was not just a gift, but a bond, a reminder of a friendship that will never be forgotten.
The team are connected in real time by a variety of chat tools. If you have a question, you ask it. Most issues are settled in real time meaning that they only have one meeting a week and that is very focused. In a virtual meeting like this, everyone is still working in parallel. In a face to face meeting this is impolite, but in a virtual meeting it helps. As issues shift on the agenda, new material is surfaced. There are never any minutes etc because it is all recorded in real time.
One of the most profound ways that we can grow as youth workers is through the continual deepening of our relationships, and through continuing education. Most churches will offer some kind of fund for conferences, books, continuing education; it is usually just a matter of asking. And it doesn’t matter if we are a paid staff member or a volunteer who believes in investing in the lives of our teens, the importance of YOUR personal growth is still critical.
Not too shabby a mantra.
c) Juno (Hera)
Couple?: Nope, she’s dating Wavves’s Nathan Williams. Plus BB was formerly her babysitter, which might make a relationship awkward. Though not as awkward as Woody Allen’s marriage.
that itches or aches. Retrace
You talk about nail biting in your book and yet your nails are clearly very long. Why did you lie?
You’ll find that few clients want to give up on quality. Not many like the idea of inferior service. So, that leaves the money. What you’ve just done is help them rationalize and justify the amount of money that was the issue just a moment ago. Most people, when they come to this conclusion, quickly realize the benefit of having the buying decision made. They can move on to something else in their lives, not investing any more time in researching the product or service and being happy to have come to this point.
And of course, Norm the Gnome...he's Mel's and travels whenever he gets the chance, or remembered.
The district basically has two options to consider. Either borrow the money and make annual payments out of the M&O side of the budget, or pass a bond and use I&S dollars to pay for the update.
From Book Sneeze:
This mason jar of sticks I made inspired by AB Chao, who was in turn inspired by this other blog. (This is known as "proper attribution.") It was good because we already had a jar, the sticks were free (thanks, backyard!) and the embroidery floss was cheap--it was a good excuse to buy a whole buttload for other projects, actually. This particular endeavor was easy enough that Cal and I could do some of it together, which is where the Mother's Day part of it comes in. We actually wrapped most of those twigs this morning (I don't know what your day looks like where you live, but ours is a Very Rainy Sunday) and they were ready for prime time before lunch. And look how pretty.
dictionary dictates our lives ~ lies
We remain behind the scenes
~ Beat the egg yolks and sugar until well mix then add in coffee mixture, follow with oil and flour. Set aside.
It’s an old Zen saying and yet how true! Pete had been there all along and yet when he offered to work with me to turn his safety training into a full day about safety, health and environment, the SHE Days were born and so was my route to recovery.
“This is just fair.” He set the slice down and reached for his Coke. What? This couldn’t be. This is part of my culture. This is part of who I am. I wished that I had never married him. Ok, not really, but that should have sent up red flags. I took away his piece.
(But she's also getting a pink tricycle)
The performances by the Trio Phoenix and percussionist
Idiocy is an understatement for this idea.
The legs...well...I don't feel the love there yet
We struck out on backpacks (bigger ones needed this year), glue stick, red ballpoint pen, second sharpie, and had to buy these new, but I am happy to give the local stationary store our scrutinized business. It not only allows us to purchase just the right amount (one is enough for now) and without the extra packaging (sold loose), but it also gives me the opportunity to support a small local business and save on gas (the big chain alternative is two towns over).
*Yelling "WHATEVER!" loudly
Sift the flour, cocoa and baking soda together.
it’s warm rays releasing flower’s sweet scent
I have left each and every one of you very high and very dry.
Speaking of famous villains, it seems that Klingons will definitely be making an appearance in the new movie. This is probably the least surprising of these potential spoilers, since the first film actually included scenes with Klingons that were later cut out. You can see them on the DVD and Blue-ray releases. I’m of the opinion that they should have been left in the movie, since they help explain Nero’s story.
What an exciting announcement I have for you! I would like to introduce two fabulous ladies joining our Design Team this week. They are both extremely talented and will bring a new and fresh approach to the Midnight Madness Sketch Challenge. If you have never visited their blogs before or seen their work, I encourage you to do so. You will be amazed by their creative talents! Before we get into our weekly details,
So pushing the idea that you don’t want to look like these fat people has the negative unintended consequence of people overcompensating and being too skinny, by certainly unhealthy means. And then pushing the idea too far that you shouldn’t be concerned at all about body image gives people the impression that it’s ok to totally neglect your health and it’s fine to have the consequences of bad nutrition and lack of exercise.
While Psalm 22 is read by Christians as foreshadowing the crucifixion, this future hope of restoration should not be ignored. By the time of Jesus’ ministry, Israel had endured hundreds of years of exile and domination by Gentiles. Many longed for the Messiah, they one who would finally liberate them from these “wild animals” who encircled them. Psalm 22 is one of the few places in the Hebrew Bible which combines the idea of a “suffering servant” with that of a triumphal Messiah.
the more I evaded the mouthier she became
If you’re not a vegan, you probably don’t understand about half of what I just said. I apologize. We have a lot of ground to cover.
I will be moving into my new apartment on SATURDAY!!!!! My dad is coming up here to help me move in, and I’m really excited since I haven’t seen him since Spring Break. I’ll be getting a mattress, table and chairs, futon couch, and some smaller items like dishes, cleaning supplies, cooking supplies, and bedding. I’ll be getting my bed frame from PBteen once I get back from home – I have to get all my clothes and some smaller items out of my room and Zach’s. I’m also hoping to get some subscriptions sent to my new apartment! I would like to get Science, Nature, The New Yorker, The New York Times, Journal of Maritime Archaeology, and The International Journal of Nautical Archaeology. I may also renew my Nat Geo subscription, but I’m not completely sure yet.
A few of the flowers on the flowering trees managed to hang on during the wind.
We no longer get memos on our desks when important agency news is announced. People we never talk to send us emails we never open.
An 86 year-old veteran became the victim of a car jacking while at a gas station in February of this year. After the car-jackers broke his leg and sped off, he was forced to crawl on the ground to find help. ‘I noticed when I was crawling to the gas station, people were walking past by me like I wasn’t there’ the man said.
Quad extensions: 3x sets of respectively, 15, 20 and 25 reps at maximum weight, circuited with bicep curls and tricep dips
Sharshar had gone on a trip. Had been away for while. Pretending he’d joined an expedition to a town where knowledge and schools were in abundance. He said he’d met a gifted old man while attending a forum. The scholar had agreed to teach him a secret craft after he’d spotted in him great reserves of talent………….
which your decree is to be in the end,
As I sit here looking at this card, I see my mistake. I should have made the card smaller.
Stress Tips, that will help you change and improve the balance in your life:
9:30 AM - leave for target. Go to the bank first. I have to use the double stroller and apple slices to keep Macie entertained in the 15 minute line. Macie is talking to everyone else in line. Penny sleeps.
Once I got up I made my way across the finish line only to find a cute girl place a much rewarded orange headband over my head, a couple protein bars, a shirt and the most delicious and most highly earned beer I’ve ever had. It was a perfectly chilled Dos Equis, which isn’t the highest quality beer in the world, but after this race, it was. My team was waiting for me at the finish line and we all exchanged cheers and high fives in joyous accomplishment. We started busting out the camera to take team photos… it was a rather glorious and momentous moment for all of us. One we will all remember. Tough Mudder has nearly 1/3 of all entries quit out or get injured and can’t finish and only the highly physical and mentally willed people tend to apply. It is a race not to be underestimated and remains up there with one of the hardest things I have ever done. It actually probably sits right there on top as the most difficult thing I have ever done.
The Duparc-Locoul family at the Laura Plantation lived and worked on one floor, built above a cellar designed for wine storage and flood protection. Creoles commonly conducted all business in the bedroom. As more Anglos moved to Louisiana, Elisabeth (if I remember correctly), one of the managers of the family sugar plantation, created an office space in the house, but businessmen still had to go through her bedroom to get there.
And so as March comes to a close and the NCAA enters the championship weekend and will then come to a close. We hope and pray that the madness that is in our life will too begin to settle and come to an end. A day or two laying in green grass under a bright warm sun all together as a family of 5 would be an amazing trophy to the end of a month long tournament in life.
AK: That’s the million dollar question. Today, as I understand it, 75% of all French majors are women. There are the historical arguments: France linked to luxury goods, to the art of seduction, supposedly a woman’s art. But for the women I’m studying, it’s important to remember that they traveled to France before the great second wave of feminism. Betty Friedan’s The Feminine Mystique was published in 1963, just as Angela Davis was leaving for the Hamilton Program. All three women lived in a socially repressive era without a women’s movement as ballast. According to the social mores of 1950s and 1960s, you were supposed to be engaged by your senior year — or else! Each of the women in my book found in France, in their different ways, a place where they could wander and explore, at a remove from their families and home expectations.
18st 9lbs (261lbs) the scales said when I stepped on them. I almost cried. My heart sank and I felt sick. That couldn’t be right. I’m officially at my highest ever. The new meds the doctor has put me on, has ‘helped’ me gain a whopping 16lbs in the last couple of months. My head spun. I was pissed!
created specifically for this once in a lifetime event by Dave Gutierrez! Day of Death 2011 was a celebration of Death
Albany Times Union
1. Friday Foster - Main Title (02:18)
I went out to dinner the other night and got food poisoning. Consequently, I spent the remainder of the night in a cold sweat crawling between my bed and my bathroom.
The Disenchanted / The Striped Basstards - Je Suis Le Firestarter (black. fast streetpunk)
Nov 4 – The Marquee – Tempe, AZ (W/Cobra Starship)
fax: 703-535-6899
II. The Blessing of Fame
Oil and blood
For this method you need to have a hexagon flower already made. Don't
separated into seed packets
Favorite Game- Manhunt
we sure think so at the rikrak home.
Nick Cave & The Bad Seeds Mercy seat AUS
In any case, "IAtW" is a weird enough song on its own, but among its more obscure weirdnesses (an example of a less obscure one being the lyrics, which, though themselves obscure in meaning, are at least easily discernible) is the fact that John had a radio on while they were recording it and the radio was playing a BBC version of King Lear. At the 3:57 mark of the video I link to above, you can clearly hear, in the background (as long as you know its there), Oswald saying "Villain, take my purse ..." and then the rest is pretty clear too, when you know what they're saying.
Happy New Year to everyone. I used to think September was a time for renewal. It is my birthday month, I would be starting a new year at school, I love fall. All these things would encourage me to want a new start. Now that I am older I feel like this time of year is good for a fresh start. I plan to reflect on the past year and maybe make some changes, or resolutions. I will realize I did quite a bit and things really are going well. I will also, because I am me, come up with quite a few things I am not happy with and work to change them.
Basically my main symptom has been heartburn, although I did have it before I was pregnant, so it hasn't been that shocking, I have just been chugging the milk. The other symptom is gas. Sorry everyone, it HAS to be documented :) Bubbles in my tummy that will not get out, so not as bad for everyone else, just painful for me. Oh the joy. I did feel more tired the first little bit I think, and took a couple naps at lunch time, but that didn't seem to last long. Basically, I don't know what everyone has been complaining about, being pregnant is easy :) I just had to say that, hopefully everyone won't hate me.
I have always felt, without being able to specify very well, that tango music has a lot in common with 19th century opera, which I like, but with the advantage that you can dance to it. It may be simplistic, but in the same way that Argentinian Spanish sounds, to me, like Spanish spoken by an Italian, tango sounds to me like Puccini for dancing.
#56. finding the perfect gift
Only difficulties were those I experienced driving with the slightly insane, yep I am convinced that half or maybe more of the drivers in Queensland are insane. They do not believe in leaving a reasonable distance between cars, indicators are obviously optional, and the use of the accelerator has apparently got to be balanced by random applications of the brakes for no apparent reason.
Lykke meowed.
I miss a real tree so much (I found something to help with that I hope to show you soon!), but I gotta say, this is SO much less stress!! A tall real tree is SO heavy and was always hard to get just right in the stand, so I was always worried about it falling. (Since the tree debacle a few years ago I started tying it to wall.)
"When Satan has much to gain, he also has much to lose. His every scheme against a child of God is a gamble." Beth Moore, pg. 202
Tuesday’s Quizzlers is………. Using a combination of letters and/or numbers to sound out the answers, can you solve the clues? (The first one is free)
"Kids are tough". Let's be sure this doesn't mean, "Kids are insensitive, unimaginative and callous. They need strong meat, even carrion: they won't appreciate anything better." Let's be sure we don't apply lower standards to children's history books, sensationalising them because we think children won't read them otherwise (and people say "it doesn't matter what they read so long as they're reading" - a statement quite as idiotic as "it doesn't matter what they eat so long as they're eating").
You've probably heard by now, that our Master of Ceremonies is once again the indomitable Leonard Cohen, who arrived a little while ago by helicopter on the front lawn, with a bevy of swinging backup babes. I requested "Dance Me to the End of Love", for openers. Stand back ladies, I have reserved his first dance. What's this in his hand? Oh my, dearest Lenny, you shouldn't have! I do believe he has brought me some kind of sparkly gift. He's so sweet, he know's what a magpie I am.
The programme was a part of the Aga Khan Development Network’s Urban Renewal Initiative at Humayun’s Tomb – Sunder Nursery – Nizamuddin Basti .
16. Tape This
We also found the power button on the left-hand side and volume rocker on the top were easy to find and use. And, because the buttons are chrome silver, they look quite attractive too.
It takes time to tune an ear, and effort, too. It means tracking down every unfamiliar song and welding the visual image of the bird to an ephemeral voice. Unless you are among the gifted few, someone with the auditory recall of Igor Stravinskly, the weld usually does not hold the first time, or the second time either. The bird with the short, bright phrases or the raspy vowels must be tracked down over and over and over. Then over and over again, until those phrases and the image of that bird fuse and become one.
Weight:
Tickets on sale TOMORROW - May 11 at 10:00am
Hard boil eggs and chop. Set aside.
and one or two for our own tree
The movie cares little for subtlety so it’s hard to read how much Catwoman is aware that she’s really kissing Batman or even how interested she even has for Bats or Bruce Wayne, but for all of the Penguin’s position in charge of the foursome, when Catwoman talks or walks she’s the center of attention. She completely overwhelms Bruce Wayne while dressed as Kitka, turning the alleged playboy into a schoolboy struck dumb by his first night out with a woman. Martinson clearly films Catwoman and Kitka to take advantage of/exploit (you pick your word of choice) Meriwether’s sexuality, too. There’s plenty of shots designed to show off her breasts and butt.
With quite a few birthday's in the upcoming month, I've
Honorifics and pronouns are also a part of this. Do you call your sister “Onee-san” at home? If you’re not Japanese, I doubt you do. Then translate it. There are many subtle ways of expressing levels of respect in English, and leaving the honorifics in is just the shortcut that lazy translators and editors take when they can’t actually express those levels. Some groups consider leaving in honorifics a part of their profile, and others religiously remove them while failing to actually translate them by expressing the mood in tone and word usage. If you can’t handle it alone, then make it clear to your editor how it’s supposed to sound and what are the implications. The oft-mentioned nuance is at stake here, and that can change the whole atmosphere and even the meaning of what’s being said.
My personal favorite is number three. All of the poems entered really exemplify what session drinking is all about. Sessions aren't just a low-alcohol beer thing, they're really about the time spent with good friends over a pint. I think Gravey embraced that with his entries. So, Gravey, being local, you get your choice of a sixer from Oliver's and (wait for it...) the opportunity to drink it with me! Seeing as he was the Best Man in my wedding, I think he'll be cool with that.
Quite pale, with a sort of delicate pear juice hue.
I wasn't really planning on doing a post today, but yesterday I put together this quick baby card. I decided not to use an image and just go with some wording, a bit of embossing and some embellishments. I was really pleased with the way it turned out so thought I would show it to you.
To be chosen as our Hunger Busting Blogger, you must be:
Deedee Horton
This is a perfect synthesis of dualism and non-dualism. The great teacher Śrī Caitanya picked up on this philosophy held by Parīkṣit and enunciated by Sūta in the Śrīmad Bhāgavatam. He developed it into a school of thought known as acintya-bhedābheda-tattva (“the truth of wondrous unity and difference”).
2007 and America is tired of all this job growth!
The summer has been somewhat busy, yet we haven't done anything. I started school for myself to get my Bachelor's Degree in Nursing. Then I've also restarted Weight Watchers at the beginning of summer. I've lost about 20 pounds so far. I'm thrilled. Another 20 or so, and I'll be done, I think.
Awesome – Despite the ups and downs, the losses and the achievements, and all the icky stuff in-between… I live a pretty awesome and blessed life.
Starbucks heroes clad in green or black aprons. There was a red sign
About a week ago, Cage unleashed this moody new joint in anticipation for his forthcoming EP, "Speak Of The Devil" , due out this Summer.. which by my calculation is right around the corner kiddies..
Last week, I received a very important phone call from Nancy at CP2 telling me that my Penny Black order had arrived in the shop. WOO HOO! I had been wanting to get my Copic stained hands on these sweet images by Mo Manning for PB, for a very long time. OMG! They are adorable and SO much fun to color! This one is called Sweet Day and I know for a fact that Nancy still has these available in her shop. I love this image because it reminds me of a strawberry dress that my mother made me when I was a wee lass. It had strawberries embroidered all over it and I just LOVED that dress. I think I even have pictures of me wearing it in one of those fancy schmancy Olan Mills photo sittings.
I had actually tried getting acrylic nails put on Spooky over the years but he reacted so badly and fought the vet techs to such lengths that they had written “UNCOOPERATIVE” in the inside cover of his file chart with a big fat Sharpie marker. Whenever I showed up, they would huddle together and glance furtively at me, and I really believe they were drawing straws to see who was going to have to go in and try to glue the acrylic nails on Spooky this time.
No, I did not make it.
Others on the Fast and Furious dance card of lemons:
“I will be coral in the Great Barrier Reef, nestled in the Coral Sea.”
All the beautifully designed villas blend into the Caribbean environs giving them a great appeal. Even without the guaranteed returns offered by the developers of these Cayman Islands properties, you can earn good returns by arranging to let the properties out to tourists.
